You’ve probably read about the giraffe that died at a zoo in Indonesia because it ate a plastic bag, well this is the zoo where it happened. Granted, this is not the best zoo and it is definitely not kept in top condition but it was still something nice to do and a good break from hotel life. The entrance fee is only 5,000 rupiahs per person. I truly wish they charged more so the animals could be kept in more decent conditions.
I started with the word Paradise and looked for a synonym that was more fitting but held the same feeling for me. When I saw the word Arcadia and read the definition, I saw how I could apply the word to my life. I want to create a place of solace in my life. I will strive for simple pleasures. You are probably wondering about me wanting quiet... I want to strive to find quiet in my mind. Easing of the stress in my life that just feels so counterproductive and doesn't help anyway. When I lay my head down at night, I feel good about my day and my mind is free of the noise I can't control. When I lived in California, I would often go to the ocean and find solace. Feeling so small next to the power of the ocean and feeling the breeze wash over me cleansing my soul. I want to find that place in my mind that can give me the release feelings because I'm not near the ocean anymore. Better yet is to change how I see my life so I'm not holding onto the burdens that would make me want to drive to the ocean to purify my mind.
I have coined a new term I believe, “new way nationalism“; it sums up the new right, in their battle for total hegemony, given the chance, they would have us rushing to the Zionist banner, contesting only Islam, whilst our country dies.
Do you have impulse buys that have become favourites?
Once upon a time I wrote a post called Mommybloggings that is so out of date now it's practically hilarious. In fact I think I may have been wearing a bonnet and petticoat as I dipped my quill feather in ink and described how some moms were here for community and some were here to become better writers, and how the division occasionally caused tension.
So now I need to come up with business goals for June. Here's what I'm proposing:
Writing lots, working on finding/building community (one of the things I find THE MOST important!), organizing local unschooling meetings, organizing (along with my mother) a Summer unschooling gathering here in Montreal (http://smugunschoolersgathering.blogspot.com/), putting together the second issue of a zine called DIY Life Zine, trying to make more time for visual art, and spend LOTS of time outdoors, in the sun and wind and rain and swiftly alternating heat and cold that always seems to accompany spring...
I used my new Spectrum Noir markers to color the stamp. I am seriously in love with the amazing variety of greys they offer - for this card I went with the Brown-Grey family, to match the patterned paper. Here's a breakdown of what I used:
Richie recognizes the shakedown. Frank and Huey get in the car, and Frank gives Huey a beating for leaving the drugs there.
She moans out
Ok, after reading my title and especially after yesterday’s post, first let me clarify. Nobodies head rolled today, ok?
Oh yes, retaining Latinos on STEM tracks isn’t just about the prospect of better paying careers, it’s about the projected population of Latinos in the US.
It turned out really great and I got a lot of compliments for it (especially from the members of the Doctor Who regulars table which makes me sooo proud!).
God does not want you to be afraid of you heavenly father! He wants you to come boldly to Him. Who else to interpret the fear of the Lord than Jesus himself! Remember, when you are worshiping the Lord, you are really, “Fearing the Lord! My friend, it is time we fear not and worship a lot!
Frying
Hence I will not worry about what's going on down at the Supreme Court. The justices are scrutinizing the health care law. I've listened to bits of the proceedings on NPR. Can I just say: BORING! They're playing a mindgame in there that only lawyers could possibly understand. May clear heads prevail. Good lord!
As you can see, Sean is a very handsome young man. Unfortunately I can’t take any credit for that — Sean looks much more like his father than he does his grandfather.
minutes to find a parking spot in the bucketing rain. Phil was
Mona
The orange has it! Don't you agree it provides a nice contrast?
parent----Our dream of seeing them grow and leave the
COINCIDENCES: Gregg Araki’s Splendor & this movie were watched within a week, and both had people going to the hotel room 333 (half of 666!).
The last couple of days have been pretty fucking random, and not necessarily in a negative way, either. I’ve had a fantastic time as an utterly confused and bewildered individual. I feel like it adds to my truly irresistible Borat-like charm. For example, today on the subway, a little girl no older than 7 and wearing a pink flower in her hair, black Mary Jane shoes, and a zebra print coat was hardcore LMFAO shuffling (if you live under a rock, as I do, refer to the very helpful instructional video is at the end of this post) as her mother read the Holy Bible, unaware. She was also stripper-style swinging on the support poles. I’m still not even sure if I’m a pedophile for glancing over more than once.
5.1 (Bonus) Just make sure your surprise is something your girlfriend will appreciate. While some women may admire the creativity of your disemboweled teddy bear with gummy worms crawling out its empty eye-sockets, believe it or not, not all women will. Some of them may decide you are indeed a future serial killer (or a guy who might pin his restraining order to her head with a knife).
Hello to all my new blog friends! Just wanted to leave a quick note to tell you all that I am home from the hospital and recovering well from my hysterectomy. There were 8 people in the operating room for my surgery which totally shocked me. There was the anesthesiologist and his med student, the oncologist who actually did the surgery and his 2 residents and 3 nurses. Right before they put me to sleep I said if there is any way to complete this surgery without having to cut me wide open please please do it. I don't know if it was because I had said this or not but Dr. S. (my oncologist) said that there were a few complications that they weren't expecting and I lost a lot more blood than usual and he came so close to cutting me open, but they were able to complete the surgery with 4 small incisions and vaginally, I can live with that! Thank you God! So I am in full recovery mode right now, catching up on reading all my favourite blogs and sleeping (lots of sleeping!). My mother in law has been my angel and is here with my FIL looking after me and the kids. I am very VERY blessed.
*Blam!*
The EPA was introduced by Nixon to regulate and moderate air and water. The implied goal was that their mandate involved not allowing room temperature air or water to become “chunky.” We now have in this nation some of the cleanest air and water in the industrialized world. We have developed new technologies and practices for protecting the environment without dismantling the economic engine. But the EPA and its gaggle of anti-capitalists couldn’t stop with success. They insisted on regulating, squeezing and demanding until they, along with greedy labor, forced many of our domestic manufacturers to pack up and relocate off shore. Admittedly, the EPA and labor unions were not the only responsible parties for the decimation of our heavy manufacturing base. I use them only as an illustration of how a government agency goes amok.
This track is now available as a free release on my facebook page under the ‘Free Music’-tab.
Brigadier (Ret’d.) Sir Percival Postlethwaite (Bart.) M.C. (and bar) M.B.E., T.D., M.A. (Oxon.)
Well, seeing as they're still theoretically meeting, we will have to satisfy ourselves with another example of just why it is that everyone in this city is so down on our big square oaf.
I'm going to see all of my family.
Do you remember Biosphere? That space-age facility they built in the desert in Arizona? The renderings and sections remind me of that. Maybe that’s why I think its so like, totally way cool. Or maybe because it’s the giant leap required to take us from the trendy Green Is The New Black, to a tangible solution with real longevity. I read that the built environment can account for up to 48% of Greenhouse Gas emissions. Imagine if we could take buildings out of the equation all together??
Sentiment is from the exclusive stamp set in the Pemberley workshop on the go (G1033)
“You keep sighing. I know there’s something buzzing around in your head.”
Para a próxima quando vos falarem em misturar estilos, na mesma divisão.
Ciao!
The one we're going to concern ourselves with today, however, is Tintorera: Killer Shark (or Tintorera... Tiger Shark, Tintorera... Bloody Waters, Tintorera - The Silent Death, or just simply ¡Tintorera!... yeah, here we go again with multiple names for the same movie. I think you already know what we're dealing with, don't you?).
My fault, of course.
Allow me to spotlight a bit of propaganda (violence, hate, gore) which Google insists they can’t do a damn thing about – the apologists insist doesn’t exist – and the detractors scream is islamophobic.
By Manipadma Jena*
45And the Jews of the faith, who had come with Peter, were full of wonder, because the Holy Spirit was given to the Gentiles,
Up until last night only one female recording artist had ever brought tears to my eyes, and that was Bette Midler. Kim Stockwood's rendition of the St. John's Waltz, made her number 2. Her newest album is all traditional music and is on my mother's day wish list now!
When human beings are placed in an atmosphere of self-preservation at the cost of all else, they lack the natural affection most of us take for granted. Shin said he didn’t understand family in the normal sense. Emotion and attachments could only be a liability in such a place where people died every day.
22a.Ing! O
Peaches & Herb – Shake Your Groove Thing
If you live in a hoary northern clime and it comforts you to think that those who move to sunny San Diego somehow miss the cold, then, by all means, wrap yourself warmly in that mantle of delusion. We don’t.
I remember the first time I got called out on the way I said this word was whilst grocery shopping in Winco. We were making some stuffed shell pasta dish or other and the recipe called for ricotta (which I called “rig-coat-uh”), and as soon as the word passed my lips Tyler turned to me and went, “We need what?”
“I don’t think we should be driving back up the mountain. We nearly got killed last time. What if he ain’t home?” Joshua asked with a great deal of apprehension. “Clooney’s always on the mountain. Where the hell else is he gonna go? He’s gotta be a hundred and ninety years old. He don’t drive, He ain’t got no family. He’s too old to be with a woman. Where else is he gonna be?” Jaxon replied. “He ain’t no hundred and ninety. No one lives that long.” Freddie responded. “Use your little bitty brain, Freddie. I don’t know how old the man is. I swear you’re as dumb as a pitchfork. I just meant that he’s old”, Jaxon replied. “He might shoot us.” Joshua added. “He only kills revenuers.” Jaxon replied. “That crazy old man ain’t never really killed anyone. People just say that.” Freddie demanded. Jaxon just looked at Freddie with the look of a deer caught in the headlights and replied, “God Freddie! You don‘t know nothin’. Old man Clooney has killed more people than Jesse James. Just don‘t nobody knows, ‘ats all.”
After a hot day touring DC on Saturday we woke up Sunday morning and finished driving to our final destination: Williamsburg, Virginia. We went straight to Busch Gardens to begin our week of fun. Xavier had a great time watching the roller coasters.
I hadn't seen the film since 1973 or so until I found the above clip on youtube. The two clips here represent about a 1/3rd of the film. So Happy Holidays.
“Kombucha is an effervescent tea-based beverage that is often consumed for its anecdotal health benefits or medicinal purposes. Kombucha is available commercially and can be made at home by fermenting tea using a visible, solid mass of yeast and bacteria which forms the kombucha culture”… Source: Wikipedia.
I was delighted
Thursday morning I got suddenly sick. I was so sick that I decided I needed to go to the doctor to get an antibiotic... I was just SURE I had an infection. ... (ok so far it doesn't sound like "good news" but I promise it is!) ... So in order to get in to see the doctor I had to neglect my afternoon shift at the bank. -which I'm sorry to my co-workers... I heard it was a very busy day!- So. The doctor visit. Lo! and behold! no infection. The doctor didn't know what was wrong with me and chalked it up to allergies. mmhmm -__- It sure felt like I was dying... I don't think allergies do that. Well anyway, I digress...
You may ask, “If God is good, how can He permit such evil to continue?” But, how can God also ask His only son, our Lord, to suffer and die the horrific death on the cross that He did? This was the greatest evil to ever take place! For God to allow his creatures to abuse(by striking him, spitting on him, & and by mocking him, and making him wear a crown of thorns and be nailed the cross) his very Word that came into the world in the form of one of us, as a creature in the flesh, and “dwelt amongst us”. The abusive situations in Haiti are closer to us and seem more of a reality because it affects us with a rippling effect that resounds throughout the world much like that of the rippling effect on a lake when a stone is cast into the water. Millions of people in the world have no idea this is taking place in Haiti, of course, but they are still yet affected by this moral evil that resounds through the world. How can this effect people in Tennessee or Russia or Australia? We are all God’s children and all connected and part of the one family of God. What we do to the “least of our brothers we do to him.” He, Christ is the new temple of God, the church, the new Jerusalem, the Mystical body. We are all members of this body of Christ of which he is its head. All parts are needed and when one part is suffering it affects all the parts, much like your human body. When you stub your toe it affects the rest of you.
Here are the pictures:
1) I'm numb to feeling things. I've taken on that "I just don't care" attitude.
Need another fun way to practice sight words?!
When we care more about giving and care less of what we take.
“A fearsome Cailleach was said to live on Perthshire’s Beinn à Ghlotha. In legend she was a terrifying hag that could take the form of any wild animal and loved nothing more than to drown travellers in pools of water with the lure of false treasure.
Well actually, I guess the problem isn’t social at all, is it?
One way to check if a contest is legitimate or not is to see whether whoever’s running it is making a profit from the entrance fees. I found out about the Premier Book Awards because the grand prize winner posted about her win of $500.
So, yes. If I were to give up something else this year (and hopefully for good), it would have to be...
Moms:
P.S. Did you hear that Pure by Andrew Miller, which I read during my book a day challenge (see last post) and loved, has just won the Costa?
Even Lord Deedes admitted: "White South Africa grew to become the economic giant of the continent, the other members of the Commonwealth virtually sank into poverty."
when I was driving to the meet-up,
Well, if you're still reading, you're either my Ma-Ma or really into hydrangeas. Feel free to ask any hydrangea related questions in the comment area and if I don't know the answer, I'll try to find out.
I'm a little frightened by what that girl will do when I am not looking.
This is what Mandelbrot, and all the other mathematicians of the time, set out to do, find simple mathematical laws which describe the seemingly random branching of trees and fingerprints on hands, and they found that they are deterministic, but very sensitive, and could be influenced by just the tiniest change in conditions. The only reason why we haven’t yet found a mathematical sum to predict the weather, is because it is very, very, very complex.
To sum-up: Be clear, be concise, proofread twice if not more times. Important info up front, then flesh it out. Use links, have assets ready. Follow-up promptly, and build your press list.
Please read, even if you are an Obama fan. It is legitimate, written by respected, Lou Prichett, formerly of Proctor and Gamble. Lou Pritchett is one of corporate America’s true living legends- an acclaimed author, dynamic teacher and one of the world’s highest rated speakers. Successful corporate executives everywhere recognize him as the foremost leader in change management. Lou changed the way America does business by creating an audacious concept that came to be known as “partnering.” Pritchett rose from soap salesman to Vice-President, Sales and Customer Development for Procter and Gamble and over the course of 36 years, made corporate history.
Currently, John Zogby is a Senior Advisor at the Kennedy School of Government at Harvard University and serves as the first-ever Senior Fellow of the Catholic University Life Cycle Institute. He also serves as a Commissioner for the Center for Strategic and International Studies (CSIS) Commission on Smart power, having previously served as a member of Congress’ Advisory Commission on Public Diplomacy.
“The Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act would create a cybersecurity exception to all privacy laws and allow companies to share the private and personal data they hold on their American customers with the government for cybersecurity purposes,” the statement reads.
BEEP BEEP! WOOP WOOP! BING BANG WALLA-WALLA BING BANG! No show on television is able to punctuate literally everything it does with a wacky sound effect quite the way Parking Wars does. No show on television also asked the audience to side with a bunch of loud, arrogant parking inspectors going around clamping cars. No show on television is as obnoxious or as insufferable to sit through as Parking Wars is. BIDDLE-DEE-DOO! Sorry, it’s contagious.
11. 3 Tier decorated cake
I haven’t lost any weight. But I’m hoping it’s because I’m gaining muscle.
As the author of the following article states in his conclusion:
I really like this name right now (and hopefully I will in the future) and I hope you guys do too. Any feedback on it would be lovely~ ( Also, the quote from my button is from The Perks of Being a Wallflower c: )
I think an interesting piece is that I need to obtain more information and knowledge before making a decision on something. Right now I’m not aware of any sort of decision that I need to make let alone the need for information before making it. Lately I feel I have been having some questions about my career and what my goals are in life. I was watching a program yesterday where the person had said, “The secret of being happy is to find something you love to do, and then find someone who is willing to pay you to do it.” I think that’s a bit easier said and done. I love to crochet for instance, but I don’t know any career paths that entail crocheting for 8 hours a day, I love to cook but know my talents don’t warrant me becoming a chef. I love to run now, but I think the possibility for me to become a professional athlete at the age of 29 is highly unlikely. I don’t LOVE finance but I have found a career path where companies are willing to pay me quite a bit to do what I do and I know that I’m good at it. Alternately I would argue that some people would say they love to have sex, but I don’t think that prostitution is really a career path or very moral. What if someone said they love setting fires should they become a professional arsonist? I know that I’m making a little light of it but my point is that I don’t know if the path to happiness is really just finding something that you love to do and making a career out of it.
We've had it now for only a couple of weeks, the kids bring their friends home more and I can share play time (Wii sports) with my fast growing boys. Gaming that fosters social and physical activity, afterall, is not too bad and more controllable than online gaming. And as long as we can mix it up with a variety of other activities, I am OK with it.
“What then are we to say about these things?
In lieu of a review of the neo-bobo-Canalside-Indian, here are a few of my iPhone notes taken down during last night's dinner:
I can hear people shouting
Albert Camus said that "We all carry within us our places of exile, our crimes, and our ravages" and he was right on but when he said that "our task is not to unleash them on the world" he obviously wasn't talking about the Crimefactory.
And meet the deity in common things.
So my question is, how can I love a book that treats women so poorly? I don’t have an answer, and I feel a little guilty about it. But I just can’t stop reading…
black olives - a large handful
Thin Song of the Leaky Faucet
Luckily, there was a comfortable space at the front - with a leather sofa and armchairs nestled in an alcove by the stairs, and some bar tables next to them - where I could sit and get quick updates on the cell without bothering other customers.
You’re off to Great Places!
As the returning warriors walk around the cities, what would they make of the minarets dominating the skylines, or indeed, of the numerous once-Christian churches now transformed into Mosques where the two million plus Muslims can practice their Islamic faith? And would they be tempted to sample the culinary delights of 100% halal greasy kebabs and spicy curries consumed en-mass by modern day Britons from scores of restaurants and take-away establishments scattered in all British towns and cities?
and sometimes a bit of a hassle because our home changes every
10. Loshon hora is permitted, or even required when warning a person about potential harm, for example, a potential business or marriage partner.
What you were I know and never shall forget:
Day 5 - Feb 5
While the dough is rising, prep the filling. In a large skillet, melt 1 Tbsp of margarine. Add the apples and cook until they first start to brown. Add the 1 Tbsp of sugar and cook until the apples are completely softened. Add the whiskey and cook until most of the liquid has evaporated, about 2 minutes. Remove from heat and stir in the cardamom.
Get your bags together
Good afternoon everyone...Just a quick post to say thank you to everyone that entered my candy and those that choose to spread the word on their blogs for me.
I used both bright and pastel color subject matter and human face shots.
6 Forced Entry 9:21
Note: On How the Road to Hell gets Paved with Good Intentions
I'm a total girl when it comes to this. It's all my mother's fault. She always said ladies don't fart. So, I don't. Okay, fine, I do, but I do in private.
Armstrong
I don't remember the last time I was so happy to see his face. He was fine. He didn't seem the least bit upset. The first thing he said was, "Mom, your crying?" Oh, if he only knew how afraid I had been. I picked him up and carried him back to where our stuff was, despite him asking me to put him down. I didn't want to let go.
with goat
Time has lost its meaning...Oh, we still grow old, but we do not live in a linear environment anymore...Granted, that was partially true before the advent of the technology revolution, but it has become much more the case now.
The story about Sean Brady will make you sick. And he’s still making excuses. He says that he wasn’t the only one who knew. In other words, it was someone else’s responsibility. And he claims that he had no power to do anything in any case.
Here's the reality: we are experiencing a market correction with respect to housing prices in much of the country. It needed to happen. Perhaps it could have/should have happened sooner, but it didn't. But that's all that's happening. Yes, it's going to affect a large number of people, but before everyone goes off their rocker about the problems with Predatory Lenders and Bad People...don't you think that this was telegraphed a long time ago? Are the CCD and me so omniscient that we could see this coming before the rest of the 300 million people in the U.S.? Somehow, I doubt that.
The other suggested dishes on the menu include Roasted Parmesan Potatoes, Steamed Asparagus, and Lemon Custard Mousse. I prefer this dish served over a neutral-flavored grain like rice because the sauce is so wonderful you need something to sop it up with! Alas, no asparagus or lemon mousse for us. I served the chicken on a bed of whole grain white rice (?? that's what the label said!) with the frozen veggie du jour.
Hightower said the only document the American Catholic Church has to guide it on the topic of homosexuals within the Church is a document from the United States Bishops' Conference called "Always Our Children."
Many Deaf receive their early schooling through something known as mainstreaming – being sent to a normal public school, alongside hearing children. These students find it exceedingly difficult, and not simply because the curriculum isn’t designed for those who cannot speak or hear English, but also because of the cruelty and unsociability of the other students. Alas, I myself – too young to know any better – am guilty of that very act.
Organic feed is strangely hard to come by and expensive in these parts; it isn’t available in Elizabethtown (our nearest town); the feed supply stores in E-town wont even special-order it for us. We have to drive an hour north to Louisville to a very special (and awesome!) organic feed store to buy our feed. But it is worth it.
“Ne..”
There are good reasons that we form habits, there is a cognitive need for us to simplify the routines of our lives into repeated and comfortable habits. And I don’t think that habits are bad things to have, but we must recognize that the bulk of our contributions to the world, the bulk of the threads that we each contribute to the social tapestry are woven out of habit. One of the common religious prescriptions for this problem is to cultivate mindfulness.
Appeal Court judge Lord Justice Alan Ward revealed his bewilderment that he got into Britain after his ejection from France. He said: “It may seem astonishing to many that the French courts were able to seek to exclude this appellant but that the United Kingdom may be obliged to tolerate his presence in our midst. How could that come about?”
And those
It’s only fitting that this latest chapter of history should be written as follows…
One of the best reasons for blogging is the opportunity to network with other bloggers who might have similar interests (or not, but they become your friends anyway). Along the way, you form friendships you may not have otherwise even considered. One way of showing your appreciation to your blogger buddies is by promoting their blogs. Today, I am doing just that. Brianna is a lovely lady who blogs about fashion, beauty, and décor. After you read the Q&A, please go and check out her blog here.
KIM: The counting is done!
Levo League now has more than 100 companies on board, which fall into three buckets — non-profit and cultural organizations; startups and small businesses and corporations. Users can cross-compare potential employers — such as AOL, Pencils of Promise, McKinsey, Pfizer, Gilt Groupe and more — since Levo’s company profiles use the same metrics. If a user finds her “dream job,” she can “hide” it so that no one can see it, except the recruiter at that company. In fact, when she searches for candidates, you’d be the first result — by moving you to the top of her list, Levo League essentially gives you the advantage with HR that’s typically obtained via personal connections.
Just between you and me? I dubbed myself "FrankenPussy" after that.
Studies have shown that eating porridge for breakfast can actually make you look younger!! Oats plump up skin cells giving you a more youthful appearance. Sprinkle a spoonful of sugar over your hot porridge for a bit of extra flavour.
100g instant custard
Eleanore had been asking me for some time, to cut all of her hair off. I said I would, and then I avoided it. Its not that I didn't want her to look like a boy, which the other girls at the park sometimes mistake her for, I just didn't want her to be unhappy with how it looked or felt. But after her consistent nagging, I finally said "alright lady, your wish is my command", busted out the clippers- the same ones that I use to cut her Daddy's and Brother's hair- sat her down in a dirty kitchen chair, seat still covered with dried leftover lunch rice, flipped the switch, and let her have it.
But there's one law in particular that we gents in particular can moan about, try and buck, but it will ultimately win through:
First things first, determine the goal of your webinar. In the case of a new product offering, you probably want people to buy it. But you can take several approaches. Maybe you provide education around the pain you’re trying to solve and, at the end, viola, you have the solution. Or maybe you just want to cut to the chase and demo your new offering.
Now I feel like I understand what it takes to produce a podcast AND I now know what a professional online class experience can be like, I'm sold. Thanks Diane!
Continues tomorrow with "Is It An Opportunity Or A Distraction?"
As a final note, here's the links I found last week including some for the services that can repair dashboards for Audi's and other cars:
Everybody and their mother claims that on Full Tilt the weaker hand always seems to win. I have to tell you, I don’t really believe that is the case, but I have to say over the past 2 days I have been beat after leading in a hand pre-flop at least 20 times when being all in. Some pretty bad, some not soo bad.
Gaurav Jaitly is a young business man, who is handling a family business. His father Rajender Jaitly died some years back & mother died lately. He was forced to look after the business at a young age, when he is enjoying his youth.
I don’t know about the rest of you, but I’m a little speechless right now. That was an ending that I didn’t see coming! Ok, I saw it coming about ten seconds before it happened, but I am thoroughly stunned by it now!
The Australian Human Rights Commission Act prohibits discrimination on the grounds of a person's criminal record.
Really I don’t know why I run when there are so many things out of my control. Plus running is pretty much a giant mind-f*ck of a sport. Worse than any other sport, in my opinion. At least when I had a crappy soccer game I could blame it on one of the 10 other people on the field with me.
Where in Germany did you go, Alex? Oh, gee, just to Hamburg, no big deal. It was a whirlwind of a weekend consisting of an early bus ride Saturday morning and a return late Sunday evening. It’s pretty wild how much information and how many activities DIS is capable of packing into one weekend, but I’m so grateful for it. Hamburg is a key location in terms of World War II and The Holocaust, hence why my Holocaust and Genocide class planned a trip there. I wasn’t really sure what to expect, and I think that’s a good thing. It was a really unique experience, and one that I don’t think I could replicate. So here’s a bit about it!
Let me know I am not alone…help a sister out here! I have issues I know, but I vow to continue one day at a time to get it right.
Philip-Lorca diCorcia (2 chromogenic prints, 1990-1992)
This was a hard dress to photograph - it is a size Large and the mannequin is a Small. As cute as the dress is on a hanger I could not get that idea across as well as I wanted.
Wow! What's happened to the gorgeous weather we had? I hope your all managing to stay warm & safe!
I ran into an English friend, Matt Beer, the other day and asked how his French was coming along. Not so good, was the reply. It turns out that Matt, one of the funnier people I know, still finds it virtually impossible to be funny in French. Because I’m also one of the funnier people I know, I totally relate. I asked Matt to write a little something about that and here’s what he sent.
Allsopp's have the distinction of being the first brewery to form a laboratory, appointing a Mr. H. Bottinger as scientific adviser in 1845 and in 1852 they were invited to prepare a special brew for the expedition that was sent in search of Franklin, and was such a great success that it was taken on other expeditions to the polar regions.Called Arctic Ale, it travelled with the British North Greenland Expedition in 1952. It is a strong ale, less sweet than a barley wine, but quite rightly described by one admirer as 'mellow as old burgundy and nourishing as beefsteak'.
Shot for Shot is our catch-all film/TV column and we can always use some good writing. I've written a series of columns looking back at Marvel's live-action films from 1970s Spider-Man and Hulk TV movies up through the 1994 Fantastic Four film, and just a week or so ago went over the build-up to The Avengers by looking at Marvel Studios' productions.
"Yeah. Cinnamons."
One can well imagine that some form of punishment may have also been implemented if anyone contravened the rules. “We saw footprints inside the observation tower this morning. Which one of you DO NOT understand the rules of this tribe?”
- Queries with more than one agent listed in the "To" field
They won’t be enough.
As a pathway of innovative lucidity
Now that I have some time off I'll not only be designating plenty of time for crafting and blogging, but taking some time to enjoy what's left of summer as well.
When you have absorbed as much sensory information as you can, you are ready to write the scene. Resist the urge to string together adjectives – too many can diminish the power of your description – and resist the urge to use everything you learned. It is better to pick one or two exceptional details that give an impression of the whole rather than attempting to describe the entire scene. Most readers today do not want to sit through long descriptions. They want to get a quick sense of the place and then move on to the action.
This morning, I woke up with puffy eyes, a sated belly and dreams of more apple tatin.
“This is necessary for us to approach the state of the Primordial Consciousness. And in the end of the spiritual Path we merge with the main Part of the Absolute — the Primordial Consciousness, the Creator.”
I know that Stephen King in his uber-phenomenal book, "On Writing" says that's how he does it.. but he must have like a built in GPS for his stories or something because I've tried doing that and I always seem to end up writing about lack of sleep or stinky diapers or college football, or something like that.
This Valentines... I am blessed! I'm reminded of God's promise for our marriage and how far this marriage has come in the last 4 years and smile because HE IS GOOD! If you know anyone struggling and hurting today, let them know you care and let them know how much you love them. If you know someone who has lost all hope... well, just tell them to come read our story and maybe they will see things a little differently. Never give up on what you love, because HE never gives up on you. :)
In time of war or other national emergency, the Congress may by law authorize the President, for a limited period and subject to such restrictions as it may prescribe, to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out a declared national policy.
Still working on the rest of the week's gifts, but will post them soon :)
Booktalk: Chick and Chickie love to play in their very own way, whether scaring each other silly or tickling the letter A. As young readers eagerly turn the pages of the story, they’ll look forward to spotting all the witty side jokes and hilarious details.
To die, – to sleep … perchance to dream’:
visible from the street
Then the ban politician are close to having the rights of returning to politics. As a Yingluck minister said today, even with Yingluck’s “C” grade people, she still managed to beat Abhisit’s Democrat Party.
Nordby KC, Irgens LM, Kristensen P. Immunological exposures in Norwegian agriculture and pre-eclampsia. Paediatr Perinat Epidemiol 2006 Nov; 20: 462-470.
First Smart Solutions™ : A good indicator is to look at how your manager and upper management dresses and take a cue from them. If you don’t know, be proactive and ask what the dress code is and what is acceptable and not acceptable to wear on the job. It doesn’t hurt to be clear. And, you’ll be respected for exhibiting courage to ask.
The Clean Towel is an innovative, sustainable and eco-friendly product that will save you money. Imagine not having to spend so much for paper towels and helping our environment at the same time. Sounds great, huh?
The IPCC’s claim that it uses only "rigorous, peer-reviewed science" is nonsense. From the IPCC’s 2007 report, she lists 5587 references (30% of the total) that were not peer-reviewed at all, which were just "grey literature", or propaganda by the likes of the WWF. So when the IPCC declares: "Science says… ", what it often means is "An activist from the WWF says…".
Speaking of work, I am taking the remainder of the week (and likely part of the weekend) to wrap up a pending, urgent work project. Otherwise, we don't have any big plans for ringing in the new year. Frankly, sipping champagne while watching Midnight in Paris sounds just about perfect to me.
Happy Summer everyone! I for one can't wait to start dropping things into our bucket. Yippee!
Satanas27: raises $0.25 to $0.50
Jonjo O’Neill (born April 13, 1952) was a highly successful jump jockey and has established himself at the top of the training ranks. In spite of an appalling list of injuries, he was champion jockey twice (1977/78 and 1979/80), and he set a then record for a season of 149 winners in his first championship year. The most sensational moment of his riding career came when he won the Cheltenham Gold Cup on Dawn Run in 1986 as the mare became the only horse to win that trophy after having previously taken the Champion Hurdle (1984), again with O’Neill in the saddle. He also won the Gold Cup on Alverton in 1979, though he had a dreadful record in the Grand National, in which he never completed the course in spite of having eight rides. He retired from the saddle at the end of the 1985/86 season and, having survived lymphatic cancer not long after that, started training near Penrith, Cumbria, in 1987. He forged a reputation with horses such as Vicario Di Bray, winner of the 1989 Champion Hurdle Trial at Haydock, and Legal Right, who landed the Grade Three Tripleprint Gold Cup at Cheltenham in 1999 and went on to capture the BGC Silver Cup at Ascot as well as the Grade Two Tommy Whittle Chase. He moved to his present base at Jackdaws Castle in Gloucestershire, not far from Cheltenham, when the yard was bought by owner J P McManus in 2001. In 2010, he finally broke his Grand National duck when saddling Don’t Push It to victory for McManus, who had been trying to win the race since 1982. Don’t Push It came third last year and is now retired. A P (Tony) McCoy rode the gelding, gaining a first success at the 15th attempt. O’Neill’s other victories at the Aintree Festival as a trainer include Quazar in the John Smith’s Anniversary
I’d never organised a focus group before, so I was a little nervous, but I feel it went really well, and the findings were extremely valuable. While I had anticipated that all teenagers were rabid Facebook users, checking it on their smartphones under the desk in lessons, it seemed this was not the case. And opinion was extremely divided on whether students wanted to interact with higher education institutions via social media. While the students claimed they didn’t want to mix their social and educational life (which is excellent news if they keep this belief while job hunting!) 62.5% of them said that they would ‘like’ or ‘follow’ a University they were considering applying to.
What’s the deal behind the Tamarind Westside? Here’s the story straight from the project’s official website copy:
After a two-year stint on the County Grand Jury, Ken felt the need to begin his first novel.
both during unnoticed instances
My worst legal transgression is my habit of driving 5-7 mph over the speed limit.
First of all let’s get one thing clear – we make no ridiculous claims to be the ‘leadership’ of the working class, nor will we ever. We are not just another political party or group that is seeking to win power for itself. We do not see ourselves as ‘political intellectuals’ who can guide the masses to victory. When it comes down to it. we, as Class War, are just a bunch of individuals who have come together to do something about the society we are forced to live in. We want to help build and be part of an independent revolutionary movement, within the Irish working class, under the control of no one but the class itself. This movement will be inspired by, and will build upon, the traditions of our class – unity, solidarity and resistance.
It was really complicated at the time. I think when Gary Held got in touch with us, it was technically Fundamental, which was a distributor that also had a label that was putting out a ton of stuff, most of which wasn't super distinguished. It was nothing more complicated than we put out the record ourselves, it sold out, it was easy then. It sold out really quickly. We got some good reviews. People came around and wanted to do something with us. He courted us in the US, he checked out alright, and we pretty much did it. I think Communion was something that he did himself, I think at a certain point Communion reflected his tastes a little more.
I'm so excited to share these cookies I made for a wedding this past weekend! The sensational Sheri contacted me a while back about making some cookies for her daughter, Brynn's wedding. When she told me the theme was peacocks and all things vintage I couldn't stop daydreaming about potential cookie designs.
(photo: Atelier de Campagne)
I’m expected to concentrate on a minimum of three, possibly four different events going on at the same time. By the time I decipher the tweet about the headline, which has nothing to do with the new story the anchor is reading (because he/she has moved on to something else), a new line is scrolling on the bottom, teasing a story that will be coming up, after the commercial break. It’s maddening, exhausting, and headache-inducing. It shouldn’t be this hard for me. I used to be one of those people anchoring the news. But that was years ago, before tweet time.
I seriously cannot get over the fact that not only does this set contain a super cute cellphone and play makeup, but it also contains an amazing cupcake purse, cupcake sash, cupcake debit card, and play cupcake invitations.
It was no use now. Even an inveterate optimist like me could see that. Not only had Don Quixote missed the windmill he had been tilting at, he had broken his lance into the bargain.
Look out for Details of our next Sponsor for March !
Robin enters the room, slamming the door.
Rich Lozyniak, CEO of North American Breweries, said that while North American has invested heavily in the once-struggling brewery, that spending has largely been on efficiency and product quality upgrades and the Genesee Brew House project would be the first "serious investment in connection with our consumers."
Wouldn’t it be nice to have rural volunteer management guidelines that watershed groups could use to accomplish more? Or a resource telling rural watershed groups where others have recruited volunteers, engaged them and celebrated them? Now we have just that.
Right, that's it for now. I'm off for a couple of days in Ceske Budejovice as a guest of Budvar, along with a posse (a tankard? a round?) of half a dozen other beer writers. I hope to come back on Friday slightly fatter, but much happier.
Do you really go to bed at 3:00? I hope so because it would really, really make me feel better since I go to bed at 3:00 too.
First up is a card I made for a few challenges. I used a new-to-me technique, which is always exciting. :o) My first Criss Cross card was so much fun to create.
"The only thing to fear is fear its self."
Partly because it was in georgeous, eye-popping Technicolor. But there was also the sheer volume of its visual effects. The Beast from 20,000 Fathoms runs an economical 79 minutes, and its effects shots add up to (surprisingly) only 7 minutes 5 seconds -- or 8.9 percent of the running time. The 7th Voyage of Sinbad runs 88 minutes, with 17 minutes 27 seconds of effects -- 19.8 percent. More monster-time, but more monsters, too; more, in fact, than all Harryhausen's previous pictures put together. The Beast, It Came from Beneath the Sea and 20 Million Miles to Earth each had a single animated creature. But Sinbad had more than you could shake a scimitar at.
everywhere and everything
In light of this here is a not too miserable track by Camera Obscura originally released as a single in 2001.
Yes, it’s a pretty general statement she made, but I thought about it later on.
I was leading a discussion of executive benefits earlier this year and an agent asked if I had any tips on closing a difficult sale. I asked him what the employer was trying to accomplish and he couldn’t answer it. I suggested he go back and diagnose the situation before attempting to close the sale. There isn’t any single approach that will compel a client to say ‘yes’ to an executive benefit plan. The keys are to:
Let me feel you moving like they do in Babylon
Joel Schumacher, who worked with Tom Cruise, brought the idea of a film remake of the novel I Am Legend by Richard Matheson to me.
It's my iPhone, MichelleM.
As with most of the Obama vacation's this year, even the Florida trip has been criticized. This time, amazingly, for being too short. At yesterday's press briefing, deputy spokesman Bill Burton faced questions about the overnight trip, saying, "They've already spent a lot of time in the Gulf." Spelling out their plans, he said, "eating the food, the seafood, hanging out with the great folks who live there, and taking a look at how things are going for those folks."
papercrafting by opening an online store full of her illustrations. That
All Fluke Infrared Thermometer Are Very Reliable
When we are honestly interested to listen, we focus on the other person. We do not dwell in our thoughts. We do not get absorbed from what happens around in the environment. We do not interrupt to get a call – especially when the discussion is vital and very important and not just about the weather. When we are sincerely interest of what the other person speaks about, what feels and thinks, what is his/her perception, we will ask further questions to help the discussion, the so-called “open questions” that open the field to further exploration and development. We will node or say a “hum” to reassure the other person that we do listen. We will ask clarifications in anything not clear to us than just give an advice, an opinion or a judgement. Even when we judge inside us, trust me, it does reflect on our face. The other person will sense it.
I may return home from either trip. I just may. :) After all, my pottery wheel is there.
Like the aromatics themselves, creating SoulCollage® cards for essential oils has been an unexpected delight in my life and has become an integral part of discovering more about my aromatic companions and myself. If essential oils aren’t your passion, perhaps you have a fondness for herbs, flowers, homeopathic remedies or gemstones.
Yesterday's 3rd Annual Gold Standard Food & Wine Event was easily the best gourmet gathering I have ever been to in Los Angeles - the best $50 I have ever spent - and one that could only have been pulled together with the cache of LA Weekly's pulitzer-prize winning food critic Jonathan Gold.
Hubby and I love cheese, any kind of cheese, and quite often when the kids go to bed you can find us eating cheese and crackers as a late night snack. Parmalat Canada just introduced a spreadable snack cheese to Canada called Le Creme Cow. The cheese comes in Original, Light and Parmesan and Peppercorn and I got to try them all. Hubby and I had our cheese and cracker evening with all three varieties and my favourite is definitely the Parmesan and Peppercorn. I love that they're individually wrapped which provides portion control. The cheese is really soft and easy to spread on a cracker. It even tastes great on a bagel or just eaten on its own. My toddler even enjoyed it too!
But I controlled myself.
As if Twitter didn't keep me from blogging enough, I joined another social media site. I am now on Pinterest. I resisted the idea mightily for quite some time. I'd heard about Pinterest, but thought, "That's for crafty middle-aged women." Never mind that I love to cook, want to decorate as a profession, maintain a little container garden, and, um, am turning 38 in a few days. As much as Country Living and Better Homes and Gardens talked it up, I figured I was too busy and didn't really want to pin up pictures.
He was VERY kind and respectful and told me a little bit about how the border works and what officers are allowed and not allowed to ask. I told him that I had no problem with the questions, that I'd answer anything they ask and he said that I'm one of the FEW who cooperate. That struck me as strange, I'd never even considered not answering a question. He hinted that the questions about my husband and why he was deported COULD have been over the line, depending on if the officer was suspecting me of something and was trying to eek out info of me by asking that - or if they were just being curious.
reborn.
The image I chose for Gary's Valentine is Magnolia's Tilda with Cozy Heart. I think she is so sweet! I picked a Magnolia sentiment that I think fits perfectly with this Tilda. Patterned paper, from the Paper Heart Collection by Crate Paper, was distressed (using my Zutter Distrezz-it-All), and inked with Stampin' Up ink. I used Stampin' Up CS for the card and the die cuts. Speaking of die cuts, I used a doily die by Cheery Lynn; a key, heart border, and lacy heart dies by Memory Box; and classic hearts dies by Spellbinders. I applied Star Dust Stickles to the key, the hearts, and Tilda's hair ribbons and shoe laces. Rather generously, I guess, but I like the effect for a Valentine. I accented Tilda with a Signo Uniball white gel pen.The largest heart has been colored with Copics and then treated with drops of Copic blender solution. A shout-out to Dawn of the Outlawz for this color-blocking technique!
The dream is our secret wish for life.
I want to go with you
What has happened to ‘naturalness’.
Last year when we played this game, DD was working on sums of 10 through 17. I made a set of cards for her and you can download the Addition Cards here.
First up....
This isn’t about a “blame game.” It’s about asking hard questions about actions and responsibility, and being strong enough to handle and do something about the hard answers that would come of such an investigation. It isn’t about pointing fingers, it’s about figuring out exactly what the hell went wrong and doing something about it. It’s too late for Kenneth, but Kenneth is not the last gay teen who needs our protection.
Here is a strange angle, looking to the back end of the store. Shiga Kogen porter is delicious and bargain at 380yen!
The drive from Northern Nevada to the Phoenix area of Arizona was relatively uneventful, save getting accosted in a gas station in Blythe by a beggar who claimed to be out of both gas and money. You always have to wonder about people like that. How did they get into the situation of being stranded, assuming they are telling the truth? Didn't they plan ahead? Do they survive through pan-handling? Are they running away from home on impulse? Have they escaped from prison and stolen a vehicle and ran out of gas? Who knows, but being a woman traveling alone, I wasn't about to whip out my purse and wallet and start counting out the cash in front of this stranger.
Ever since Björk became one of the biggest stars in the world back in the early 90s, she has refused to rest on her creative laurels while still managing to keep her music in the spotlight: ‘The essence I don’t think has changed at all since Debut. I’ve just become better at working in the studio and I feel like I’m a better singer. People keep saying: “Ooh, between every album it’s a revolution”, and they either praise me or knock me for my short attention span,’ she smiles. ‘And I’m like: “What short attention span?” I don’t feel like I’ve changed at all.
“No, no you can’t go in there alone.”Reilly stepped out of the vehicle and studied his friend. The panicked tone surprised him. He had never seen Jacobs this shaken before. The man could scoop up brain matter off the sidewalk with out batting an eyelash.
Orvieto - a beautiful hilltop town built upon a plateau of volcanic tufa, giving it spectacularly pretty views over the surrounding Umbrian countryside. The town's skyline is dominated by the incredible Duomo, which is especially glorious in the late afternoons as its gold facade catches the light of the setting sun and begins to glitter during the "magic hour" that all photographers know and love! It's a really lovely town, and super easy to get to from Rome or even Florence if you are after a day trip, although I recommend staying there for at least a few days if you can (Casa Selita is wonderful - it is nestled in a small olive grove just outside the city walls, and the owners, Selita and Ennio, are some of the warmest hosts ever). I will say that using the bathroom on the train from Rome to Orvieto was kind of an interesting and moderately alarming experience (dodging rivulets of what I could only assume was the pee of passengers who had gone before me ... flush = pedal that opens the base of the toilet out onto the tracks rushing below ... oh and PS, stuff some tissues in your pocket just in case, because I found that toilet paper on those trains was kind of a rarity), but that's all part of the fun of travel, right? :)
Can’t see past her scarlet letter
armour and heavy helmet at the end of the day, the job lingers - and
When I left the workforce back in early 2010, I was making an annual salary of $72,000. Each paycheck (after taxes, deductions and a 401K contribution) was approximately $1,800 – twice a month. If I went back to work full time, I probably wouldn’t make MORE than I was making previously. I might even take a pay cut since I’ve been out of the workforce for two + years and the economy has gone from bad to worse. If I was lucky, I could make about $1,700 per paycheck - $3,400 per month. Not too shabby! An extra $3,400 each month would be AMAZING after living on a single income for the past few years. However - then you factor in child care costs and things start to get pretty ugly…
No such luck. The message was a simple appointment reminder. Still don't know whether I'm coming or going.
I’ve had my share of the usual field sketches while designing landscapes for clients, but it’s been a while since I’ve kept a field journal for myself. I kind of miss the spontaneous feel of quickly dragging a pen or pencil, in a somewhat messy, yet intentional manner, across a page to do a quick sketch of something I see.
And the air's entirely, from where I sit, empty,
also printed out some materials from afterschool.com for interview's tips and references.
Buh-bye.
Of the celebrities, only Robert Foxworth is still around. As for contestants Bruce and Sylvia, who knows? If they are still alive and prosperous, then I wish them well, especially the good-natured Sylvia, who took her mistake (and slip of the tongue) in good stride.
I had the privilege of attending a very holy woman's funeral this week. Sister Mary John was 96 years old when she passed away. At the age of 16 she left her family in Ireland to follow her Lord and become a Sister of Mercy. She spent her entire life proforming acts of mercy until she herself needed caring for. Even at the age of 96 she was still learning everything she could, and was always thinking of others. As her eulogy was read there were no great acts or momentous occasions mentioned-just every day ordinary acts of unordinary love.
Palmiotti and Gray have six issues under their belt and they have kept Hex in Gotham the whole time. In that time frame Hex comes to Gotham tracking a few bounties. During that time he is hired by Detective Lofton of the GCPD to assist in tracking down a serial killer. He gets teamed up with Amadeus Arkham. During their investigation, Hex and Arkham stumble onto the Lords of Crime (as well as Mayor Cobblepot).
I'm determined to find ways to make the look work for me... so basically, what I've always done in the past (add short skirt and heels). What do you think of tomboy style? Which archetype do you most identify with?
A couple of months ago Vicks hosted an blogger event to feature some products to help moms get through the cold and flu season, such as their Behind the Ear thermometer, cool and warm mist humidifiers and inhalers. We're coming out of the cold and flu season now, but their tips on getting the most out of your humidifier is more relevant than ever during allergy season, so I wanted to share them with you:
Leather jacket, Wilson's Leather
the forgotten smell of worms.
“What this power is, I cannot say. All I know is that it exists …and it becomes available only when you are in that state of mind in which you know exactly what you want …and are fully determined not to quit until you get it.”
Mike: That was Wesley Snipes.
3. Companies would be broadly immunized from both criminal and civil liability for sharing personal data under CISPA. This is important, because the threat of lawsuits is crucial to ensuring that companies respect the privacy of their customers. Under CIPSA, conversely, corporations would have little incentive to err on the side of protecting privacy and would not face legal sanctions for even wholly unjustified invasions of privacy.
Many organizations do have the amount of staff needed to turn everything around. They also have the amount of money to reallocate to new efforts. The fact that older, established, and well staffed organizations are going bankrupt means that they are, or had been, suffering from entitlement issues.
No mockeries now for them; no prayers nor bells;
4’40 Drink Drank Drunk
We are going to take an unlikely trip. Walking downtown Syacuse on the Erie Canal. Why? The Erie canal is way North of Syracuse after being diverted North when it was widened into the “Barge Canal” in the early 20th Century, and no longer is in Syracuse. The Erie Canal used to run directly downtown Syracuse and there resides a wonderful Erie Canal Museum which I highly recommend anyone see. On this late Spring day I visited Syracuse and it was very chilly still and the clouds were almost unbelievable in their puffy grandness. I walked around most of the downtown area taking bracketed photos of many older buildings and parks. I also have old postcards from the turn of the previous century showing what things looked like in the olden not too far past days. Please walk with me all around and feel free to ask questions if you want to see more.
There is a time to occupy your head and body with reality. As well there is a moment to wonder in the splendor of your beautiful spirit. Next month I will be going on yet another adventure with Pam and the mermaids in the desert.
Oh right. So I'm back from vaca! But um, ya... I'm not here on my blog again today.
Modern Man can often intervene and draw water out of the groundwater reserves during droughts to save crops, but only if the reserve is there. When nature is raging, all we can do is stand back and hope that we can later recoup the losses.
Gornuk was one we know who died—
I suppose that spending time with my kids is kind of important, but I really SHOULD be doing the dishes. And the laundry. And the vacuuming, dusting, windows, cleaning out the car, mowing the grass, beating the rugs, painting the living room, reupholstering the sofa, building a rainwater collection system, writing my book, serving soup at the homeless shelter, knitting blankets for the NICU, going door-to-door to raise money for land-mine disposal, spaying and neutering the neighborhood cats, running for elected office...
The book does not need to be followed in any particular order. By the way, I found what I was looking for ......Power's Out Emergency Kit list...can be found on page 149! I will start gathering battery operated lanterns, candles, extra sets of batteries, etc. very soon!
What is a ‘hate crime’? Saying that Islam ‘is a death-cult and a killers’ religion’? That may be too strong. What about saying that Islam ‘is a bad religion’? What about factual statements such as ‘Mohammed had sex with a 9-year-old girl’? Or ‘Mohammed exterminated the Banu Qurayza Jewish tribe (the dead amounted to between six and nine hundred men) and was recorded to have personally beheaded up to 900 people’? Are these statements hate crimes?
The time to shoot is immediately upon seeing his weapon. You are not a policeman who has to try to arrest the guy. No need to scream at him. No exposure while you yell for him to drop the gun.
Short run WTP? t-shirts were made by a local rock music record store, this one was lost to antiquity. pic: Stuart Maitland (Buttface co-editor)
Well, on that cupcake day, I wasn't coloring. I was just going to sit there, because in a few minutes we were going to go sit on the sidewalk and eat cupcakes and celebrate that kid's birthday, and McGruff wasn't going to matter anymore. Except when it came time for the party, and I tried to join my classmates in filing outside, my teacher stopped me. She told me in a stern and unsympathetic tone that I must finish my coloring sheet or I was not going anywhere.
Nearest Tube: Old Street, take exit 2, walk down Old Street, turn left at Hoxton St, opposite Curtain Road.
me, I don't
- I'm not listing all the clothes and brands and whether they were thrifted or consigned or whatever. If you have a question about an item, please ask!
The thing Rozycki calls “phonosymbolism” (or sound symbolism) is related to synesthesia (stimulation of one kind of sense-impression by another) and other rhetorical concepts. The key idea that connects all of them to the Chinese “word family” is that they enable us to reduce the number of distinct morphemes in the inventory of a language. When I try to do this — sift down the number of morphemes — in real language materials, two worries come immediately to mind:
The Bad: Seeds remain viable in the soil for years. The spines are everywhere on the plant, particularly brutal when they dry out in summer. As I am typing this I have itchy red pinpricks up and down my arms and legs even though I wore long sleeves while yanking them.
Captain America (Steve Rogers):
More than 2000 tribal members died in the cave as a result of hunger and thirst. The Boers believed that Mokopane also died, but according to tribal members who survived the siege, Mokopane managed to escape. The death of so many members of his tribe rested heavily on Mokopane’s shoulders and shortly afterwards he committed suicide by drinking poison.
We look forward to hearing from you!! The deadline for the call is Sunday, May 20th.
So with what am I to bake in the interlude? In between? This time of year, with the weather morose and the apartment still a tad chilly, we long for a satisfying snack, crave something homey, the perfect comfort food to nibble on while sipping a mug of steaming tea or with hands cupped around a warming bowl of coffee. Yet in the anticipation of a bright, warm spring, I no longer want rich, heavy snacks, nor gooey, sticky desserts. Light and delicate yet with gratifying toothsome bite, the tang of berries, the sweetness of fruit would be perfect, balanced out with a mildly nutty warmth, all cupped in a tender pastry shell. Not too sweet, neither too bland, a tasty treat to wile away the time.
No government official has been challenged to justify that timetable, though presumably the issue would be aired in a hearing.
But, my favorite thing about digital clocks is number patterns. Not waiting for one, like when you drive and wait, wait for the odometer to click from 49,999 to 50,000.
The lack of sunshine kept the butterflies quiet and flowers closed, but the outing refueled the creative drive and we had fun practicing our camera skills, trying a variety of settings, looking for a splendid composition, and enjoying being out and about.
I love these kids! In a big way they are my Gabe's adopted siblings. They are kind, sweet, respectful and so well behaved. If I can do half a good a job as my friends Dustin and Tara with my own kids, I'll be pleased.
Georgia’s Department of Transportation, for decades simply known as the “Highway Department,” is powerful by virtue of a Constitutional appropriation of all the motor fuel tax revenue collected by the state, but it is not politically popular. It is widely mistrusted as a tool of the road construction industry, and was deeply implicated in politically determined interstate highway route selections during the 1960s that rewarded favored landowners while pauperizing the less politically connected. Conservationists made a big step forward by allying with the forest-land owners and farmers against the “Asphalt Boys.” All parties agreed to oppose the abuse of eminent domain, and jointly turned to fighting a specific unpopular road project: the Metro Atlanta Outer Perimeter Highway. It was ultimately defeated, or at least postponed indefinitely; today it remains unbuilt.
Flight is expensive. Jan Smuts - Sao Paulo-Bogotá. Container was 134k. Wasting this amount of our cash flow was a Major mistake. Electric appliances here are far superior to the ones in SA, and the voltage is 110v. This is a jungle, so the furniture is cheap and magnificent. Houses are smaller, and half of our belongings are in storage. Further waste of much needed cash.
Red velvet mandarin-collar jacket, Newport News. Brown tweedy skirt, Newport News. Beige lace and sequin overlay camisole, Moda International. Brown and gold-tone necklace, Target. Brown boots, Nine West.
And the pincushion! How cute is that? Don't you love the fussy cut text fabric? Ayumi has such an eye for fabric placement. She always picks the perfect combination for the perfect place. If you are as smitten with text fabric as I am, you can pick up some in Ayumi's shop.
until they are yelling..
Knowledge is not enough to meet life’s problems. We need wisdom, the ability to handle life with skill.
The downstairs club, the Ballroom serves up eight different cocktails (from 12-14€) in a funky subterranean speakeasy with loud music, and enough comfortable chairs and couches laying about to let the cocktails comfortably sink in, tummy full of meat.
Dallin thought it was the coolest thing ever!!
Fictional characters Gran, Cal, and Alice take on a trip across Canada, visiting every province, territory, and capitol city. Each province or territory is introduced with it’s flower and bird along with an list of items to find there. Side notes include “Cal’s Tweets,” “Hamster Updates,” “Cal’s Historial U-turns (graphic vignettes),” and “It’s The Truth!” provide additional information.
I’m pretty sure my shrieks jolted the whole neighborhood. Turns out that I posted something on his wall,and he liked it.So don’t fret if you still remain unnoticed even after you’ve decided to permanently reside on his FB wall,you’ll have your time. ;-p
Five of the soldiers are on trial for pre-meditated murder, after they staged killings to make it look like they were defending themselves from Taliban attacks.
Metacritic: 38
Take care when feeding the cable though so you don’t nick the insulation as shown above. Leave yourself a fair bit of slack at the top which will make life easier when soldering on the LED display, for example:
Over the years I finally got the courage to ask my mom what that had been all about, and she said it was because he was my step-grandpa and felt way too young to have a grandchild at the time.
My college boyfriend called me every version of bean he could think of: Bean Head, Cocoa Bean, Sugar Bean, etc. This was our anecdote to sickeningly sweet pet names. Later, these actually became my pet names for my pets.
Here's a good way to start. Having said that, "This ain't gonna happen" My humble opinion of course. Pay cuts for the rich! Err, Congress. Compliments of "The Hill". Clik Here. It seems several taxpayer groups think pay cuts are in order for Congress. Who's going to argue with that. $174,000 is a little more than I make working for The Home Depot. Probably more than most Americans. Here again in my ever so humble opinion it would have to be a substantial cut. A small $5000 token cut ain't gonna get it for me. I once heard a story, don't know if it's true or not that George Washington had to put his farm up to have the money to go to Philadelphia to his own inauguration. I believe it was on Paul Harvey's "The Rest of the Story" One of you historians can check it out. Personally with all the benefits I think they should get about a grand a week.
First proper English pub: The Lyric.
Early in the morning when the church bells toll
BN in Jersey!
I still miss Gaspe. But, I'm glad to be home!
One would like to advice the wise intellectuals ,please be more reasonable and have a kaizen approach towards life in which an individual tries to achieve new standards but with a very tolerant and scholarly approach…
After the kids had their fun, it was time for the adults to party! Keri called our favorite babysitter, Meredith, to come and keep the kids for the evening. He also made an appointment for me to get my hair done and arranged for a dinner out for us! We loved the time out together and I'm so thankful for a husband who loves me so well!
So there's a bit more of a glimpse at the kinds of things we fit into our homeschool day. I have a couple more postings about our first aid unit and then I will be posting about some of the other things I mentioned.
Is it really enough for the media to accept the word of a state official who says in effect “Its okay guys I've seen it, its cool, you don't need to worry you pretty little heads about it” if that satisfies today's “investigative journalists” we are certainly not talking about the likes of Woodward and Bernstein here are we.
Piranesi (dream fantasias) and Wilson (idealized but apparently real)
our 20th Anniversary at one of our favorite places.
Although some elements have been seen tested at earlier race weekends, this is the first proper appearance of the new assembly. The wing now features a twisted main plane section and a revised cascade.
If you think about it, this is true of all our relationships. You can enjoy a one-off event with people you aren’t all that interested in. You might enjoy the event, whether or not you enjoy the people at the event. But if you didn’t click with your fellow participants, you’re not very likely to return for a future event (unless you’re really bored). Consider the opposite circumstance—you go to an event with some people, and while there, you really click with them. You enjoy their company and conversation. If, in the future, they invite you to another event, most likely you will accept the invitation—not because of the activity itself, but because you want to spend more time with those people. In fact, you will willingly do something which was less stimulating than your original experience for the sake of the people you get to spend time with. It is character, and not activity, that drives memorable relationships.
Sometimes in our endeavors to find potential
45 years and wouldn’t create jobs or
Well, I finally found one. And it all happened rather unexpectedly. Tyler contacted me out of nowhere to consult on his latest screenplay. My prices have gone up a bit in recent months so I got the feeling he was reluctant. But in the end, he decided to go for it, and sent me a script called “The Disciple Program.” “Cool title,” I thought to myself, then prepared to note away.
Logan’s four page report focused entirely on Perez's moral and religious beliefs. Perez is a self-described non-denominational fundamentalist Christian, an ordained minister who home-schools his children. He is also firmly convinced that protection of civil liberties is the paramount
Check your email inboxes, you should have received an email from me with your parter information.
She was saying to me, “I don’t want to be this Italian momma cooking the meatballs, blah, blah, blah. “ I said, Talia, you may be an Italian momma cooking the meatballs, but that is not what this is about. You are a monster.
Hope & Healing
And that's it. Even though there are a lot of instructions above, they have been written for those of us who have little experience. Anyone who has baked before will just need the recipe and will go on with it. As I said, it will only take about 10 minutes in various stages.
She entered my room to get Abigail a tissue.
I’ve been to HLD before (also have a review on this blog), so having them set up this little dumpling cafe permanently was a great idea for the business. And for me…
So remember my post about getting a speeding ticket? In it, I said it was my comeuppance for all the times I was speeding and didn't get caught. I was going to pay the fine and go traffic school and that would be it.
I know that as with anything on this journey to sustainability, there are baby steps and some things that are more conceivable than others for my family to accomplish. I wonder what alternatives are available to fix this problem. Is anyone researching it?
CR: I absolutely believe Anna is already the nineteenth century. Mozart is a genius. What he writes for Donna Anna is unique. “Non mi dir” reminds me of Casta Diva, and when singing it I must use the same legato and the same drama in the agilities.
It’s all in my head. I didn’t put it there. Yes, you did. Ok, I did. But I don’t want it there. This thought, this feeling of breaking into pieces of insignificance. I’m a little mixed up, I guess. Not sure what to do, not sure how to think and not sure what I feel. Trying to get myself in line. Straighten myself out. Stop making a chicken farm out of a feather. Stop the thoughts from running away with my sense. Some moments I wish I could let go and just panic for a while. Then I snap back to reality and tell myself I’m such a fool and I need a good smack across the face. I would bang my head through the wall if I could be sure it helps. I’d do anything if I only knew it would help. But since I’ve got no real idea what the problem is I can’t figure out a way to solve it. Of course deep down the problem is in my head. Should I try to lose my head and get a new one? I don’t know. I haven’t got a clue. Only thing I know is that I want to think about other things and feel good. But I can’t.
Thank you for being here and for all your incredible stories. And thank you to our talented host for working so hard to make this a trusted, supportive venue.
Brock: Ok, I promise.
“Well, the best jobs are the ones that find you.” I couldn’t believe how cheesy I sounded. I was like some sort of chipper guidance counselor. What in the world did I mean, anyway?
weaving
Governor’s School is a phenomenon known to the inhabitants of North Carolina and a few other states, so if it means nothing to you, never fear. Though it would be difficult to condense perhaps the greatest six weeks of my life into a chunk small enough to be respectable on a blog, I will do my best.
- used .5kh of mince/beef to make browned beef with onion (when I need it I can add to spaghetti sauce or taco seasoning for a fast dinner.
We have a small piece of land to live on and they have fields that go beyond our sight. We have servants who serve us, but they serve others. We buy our food, but they grow theirs. We have walls around our property to protect us, they have friends to protect them."
During the casting preamble I had little feeling of what was about to occur. I shall spare the details but I fucked up quite badly and although it was by no means a bad audition, it was not up to my usually high standard, which considering the importance of the casting made it all the worse.
The Nordstrom models cost $149, but come with two brush heads, and since a replacement brush retails for $25, this is a pretty good deal.
The exciting collectible packaging also includes: a Special Edition collectible ‘Senet’ Game as seen in Season Six, a custom LOST island replica, an exclusive episode guide, a collectible Ankh, and a black light penlight.
cold ice latte's in the sun
* The man from Aberdeen who refused to sell a Box Brownie camera handed down to him by his "ald grandad" in his will in order to pay for a bus fare to attend a voluntary placement interview fifty miles away. His response? "They wanted me tae flog it on eBay" he shrugged. "I would nae."
So Dear Ones, be determined to ride out whatever comes your way between now and Ascension. Do not let anything get you down as whatever happens it will be short lived. If you suffer losses they will be more than made up to you, and remember that you cannot take anything with you into the higher vibrations unless it is compatible with them. That is why no soul can force its way into them, and will automatically find itself at its correct and corresponding level. Understand that you all progress at your own speed, and have had equal opportunities to choose the path to Ascension. So please do not upset yourself should a near loved one choose differently to you, and honor their freewill choice. Loved ones are never far away, and you will always be able to meet again.
Greenfingers bites off more green rock than he can chew. Can he still be hungry?
Please excuse the putty muck still on the glass.
“Është secret!” (It’s a secret!) He replies winking at me and smiling.
once again I've let too much time slip by... but I have a good excuse I promise.
Um, isn’t that already there? There are already signs, so ignorance is applicable. And you’ve set a very clear speed limit, so isn’t 61 already greater than 60? So why make more rules?
A warrior must be cold in battle and willing to fight to the death.
I don't think infertile couples are the only way to meet that need. I think every Christian is called to consider adoption. The call and command to orphan care, is after all, throughout the Bible, and it is rarely if ever connected in scripture to infertility. But, particularly with couples going through infertility…it seems so obvious to me. But I don't say that with coldness or judgment. I have sat on the other side. The side of wanting children and wondering whether I will love that child that didn't come from my body as much as I would love a child that did. I get it. But, now that I am on this side, I know that you do. You will. God does it.
and take pain away.
Q: How much is your rent?
is more t this
I am so excited about this Winter Wonderland blog hop this weekend and so glad you decided to join us....hopefully you came here from the very talented lady- Fern's blog- if not you can go to the list I have below and click on anyone's blog to go to. So this week we have the challenge over at Fabulous Fridays at Frosted Designs to use of acrylic, vellum and/or transparencies- fun fun. So I have a layout, which I used an acrylic overlay- (plain sheet), I then painted a design in two colors- that fit what I needed for my layout. Then I cut out the patterned flowers and attached with pop dots -on top of the acrylic sheet, after I colored & added diamond Stickles to them. I choose a simple black and white floral/leaf patterned paper and cut out a circle with my Fiskars circle cutter and flip it to the other side to fit right in the middle. The white mat look on the photos is really white acrylic paint instead of cardstock I tend to use this technique (painting) often.These photo's are of my cousins wedding and my two sons with the beautiful bride-so this page is for my scrapbook of memories.
to create the positive habit.
A couple of years ago, after I escaped a very negative living arrangement, I adopted the mantra, “if it’s neither positive nor productive, walk away.”
This is bloody and the truth,
I urge anyone who lives in the Tidewater area to attend.
The very first Red Mango store opened in Korea in 2003.
Those of us in Greater London must do all we can now to support, and show solidarity with, the teachers and lecturers planning to strike on Wednesday 28 March.
I’m reading the Book of Mark right now. I have a Life Application Bible (NIV). This Bible has life-pointers at the bottom of each page explaining the meaning of the verses. Sometimes these meanings are historic and some have spiritual meanings but, always, help the reader to understand the Bible better.
How are those caramelized onions coming? You want them a nice dark golden brown.
The world is firmly established; it cannot be moved.
When the water boils, add the oats, give it a good stir, turn down the heat to the lowest setting, cover and cook for 7-8 minutes, stirring occasionally.
At the conservative blog Hot Air, the blogger "The Other McCain" had sympathy for James' position.
Have you noticed how many television commercials these days start with a question?
The paper that the rosette is made from was the original paper I was going to use for this card. But the darkness and shimmer of it made it really hard to get the elements to work with it. I think it looks great as a rosette embellishment though! So I chose a different, more subtle patterned paper :) Of course, it had to be blue because that will always and forever be my favorite color even if other colors periodically become my temporary favorites :)
As far back as 1999, it was reported that around 2,000 British Muslims were being trained in British terror camps, mainly in London and Birmingham. As well as studying holy war, the trainees were taught hand-to-hand combat, survival skills for guerrilla warfare and advised to get real military training in war zones like the Yemen and Afghanistan. Many do, because Birmingham accents have been picked up there by RAF Nimrod aircraft.
Streaming Media Player Support
Late hang over breakfast of cheese and beans on toast – again. Couldn’t face the left-over minestroni soup.
I'd garner the devotion of the nerds through my powerful and outspoken stewardship of the school newspaper, and the black crowd would have my back after an impromptu rap-off saw me proclaimed "the illest, chillest honky muthafucka since Vanilla Ice", such was the impact of my mad skillz. 'A-Dogg' was how they would choose to address me from then on.
The dispute over the tunnelling along Jalan Sultan erupted after landowners were informed by the government that their properties would be acquired for the MRT project.
Today let me reassure you that God knows right where you are, and He knows how to get you where you need to be. Even when things don’t go the way you planned, His hand AND LOVE is upon you. Do not be afraid. Trust that God is working behind the scenes on your behalf, that He will fulfill your dreams and lead you into the life of blessing that He has prepared for you.
According to a jar of amazingly delicious peanut butter that we were gifted by a friend who had just returned from Cordoba (the province right next to ours), Hernando, Cordoba is the nation's peanut capital. If you ever see a jar of "La Campiña" you should grab it, and a spoon, and go. to. town.
Tortuga: That's what I do! See! I do love her. (Pause) Corazon, YOU don't cry when she leaves or worry that she might have an accident and never come back. YOU don't love her.
Hello! What a hideous day we're having! Hopefully all the people in the north reading this are tucked up snug indoors!
SBS’ ’2012 K-Pop Collection’ will air April 2nd at 6PM KST.
All in all, after a rocky start and a scary ending with a tornado, 2010 wasn’t too bad. This year I’m looking forward to a less stressful life, managing my health and living with lupus in the slow lane. Despite everything I remain optimistic and determined to live in the present. Stay tuned.
Deputy Joan Burton: ￼ ￼ Thank you, a Cheann Comhairle. While I may have it wrong, I believe it has been the tradition in this House that if somebody uses seriously wrong language, he or she normally has the politeness to withdraw. It is a clever way of putting—–
“What is it?” I snap at him.
How stinking cute are those? I couldn't find the peeps snowmen so I settled for a chocolate covered guy in the package.
We count ourselves as deeply lucky that we have wonderful clients who make it possible for us to make a living doing what we love. Thank you to everyone who we work with, who re-blogs our photos, who offers us encouragement and advice, who refers fabulous clients to us, or who simply is a fan - we have each of you to thank for another successful year!
I think about how he was the first of four kids. How his siblings arrived after him, the first one when he was only 15 months old, the other two in rapidfire progression soon after.
I kept thinking it would just go away, but then it didn’t. Then fall of my second year arrived, and I was still having the same problems. They were excusable in a first-year but not in a second-year. I made plans to kill myself on my birthday, but of course I didn’t follow through on them. I didn’t even try.
How do you explain what you do? Not everyone will understand the language you use to describe your business. You probably talk to like-minded people most of the time but there will always be people who either don’t want to understand or who are unfamiliar with eco focussed business. Think about changing the language you use to target the person you are talking to if you want to engage with them.
We also have some nifty old stuff in our house, besides me and hubby. They have sentimental value as they come from hubby's ancestors. This is a washboard that hubby's paternal grandmother actually used:
The thing about being a reader of my blog is that you’re instantly a REALLY SPECIAL PERSON in my life, whether I actually know you or you’re just passing through, because you get a peek into this thing we can call my mind. Actually, probably even my soul. My writing is usually the most vulnerable, honest, and open part of myself.
Ego is nothing but pride in its inflated form. An arrogant man is unduly or excessively proud of his wealth, status, learning, etc. He shows ego in spirit of conduct. He is unwarrantably overbearing and haughty. His head is swollen like the swelling caused by dropsy. He thinks very highly of himself and poorly of others. He claims much for himself and concedes little to others.
Native Son Richard Wright (s)
You say the hill’s too steep to climb
By the way: I would LOVE it and be very grateful if you would also share resources that have you served you well in your pursuit of lifelong learning. Let’s grow together!
That's good copywriting. And I know. I've been a copywriter for more than 15 years, and I'm pretty jaded. When other catalog copy manages to move me beyond the product to the experience, I bow down in homage.
Sweet days of summer -- the jasmine's in bloom
Some of them were old school friends that I hadn't heard from in decades.
The raging colour, singing loud, partakes
This word of the Lord came to pass in the next Chapter, 22:38.
What is a son of man that you take care of him?
Simply Rustic's ingredients are unrefined, wildcrafted and/or organic. The products are 100% natural because no water is used so there is not a need for synthetic preservatives. Simply Rustic's products are made in small batches from scratch, not a do-it-yourself kit.
There is a phenomenon in physics that involves producing electromagnetic energy, i.e., some form of light, by purely physical means. You can try it yourself: Take some adhesive tape into a nice dark closet and pull some tape off the roll very hard, very fast. With some luck you might see little flashes of light. Those are not optical illusions, you really have generated light by pulling a piece of adhesive tape. This device, under development, apparently uses a version of the principle to produce X-rays, which are even more energetic than visible light.
Small piece of dark chocolate.
8. Leave to cool on the baking sheet then move to a cooling rack.
The wannabe opinion formers have been trying to sell this hoary old combo as modern and cutting edge for over 40 years now. When they first started Enoch Powell was still thought of as a potential future Prime minister, TV came in two channels, both black and white, Ronnie and Reggie ran the East End and Vesta beef curry was considered exotic and sophisticated, surely there comes a point when something ceases to be innovative and becomes a failed and discredited dogma.
I can't take it anymore. Its eating me up. The jacket isn't a dollar, but I scrape together my pennies and walk Penny over there.
Hi Tension ~ British Hustle ~ Island ~ 1978
Dear bloggers: Would you like to have some other bloggers give you an honest critique of your blog? You won’t know who they were either. You can take their advice or dismiss it as you please.
Since then, I’ve done three more pork bellies, and I’m happy to report that things are coming along nicely. Nicely enough that I decided to share once recipe and a few techniques.
People smugglers have tried to put 85 Sri Lankans on a boat from Indonesia to New Zealand, leading to claims that the Gillard government’s Malaysia swap policy is prompting asylum seekers to bypass Australia and undertake ”more desperate and longer” journeys.
624. Deluxe Pho @ Nam Phoung (Philadelphia, PA) 4:45 p.m.
“No, thanks. I’m waiting for my miracle.”
Gaming
One of the most notable things about Spanish culture is its religion. In order to understand the Spanish culture you need to understand their Catholic environment. So, due to perfect timing, I have chosen Holy Week, or Semana Santa as it´s known in Spain, as the starting point for my Spanish Culture section.
5 frog
Commanding General, U.S. Army Materiel Command (‘01-‘04)
- More officially started my internship
There was a lot of blood.
Bangers and Mash = food = Sausage and Mashed Potatoes and not in anyway an innuendo
Inside a Scale Model of the Human Heart
No complaints, really. I mean that's been my goal with this social stuff. To have enough options that I can go and do it if I want, and I can stay home and chill if I want, too. So the laundry waits patiently. It'll all get done.
Among the weeds I found the first eggplant. About time, I have had my fill of squash so it will be nice to give something else a try. Last year we didn't grow eggplant so I am not sure what to expect as far as how fast it grows. According to Wikipedia 20 pounds of eggplant has the same amount of nicotine as a cigarette so I need to build a huge drying rack if I am ever gonna a get a smoke out of these things.
this long winter
One of my underlying theories about running a preschool is that if you have a lot of anything, you can use it in the classroom. In the aftermath of the balloon cage, we always have a lot of popped balloon parts left over.
+(real life, Nip/Tuck #84) Sean’s bedroom clock was 11:26PM, and then we noticed ours was as well!
It was easy for me to dismiss this lady as a terrible parent, rage against her, and move along; after all, her behavior, the way she handled the situation, simply disgusted me in so many ways. That said, I really have no idea what preceded this event minutes, hours, days, or weeks ago. I have no real idea of what kind of parent she is at all. Maybe her son has needs that she does not know how to fulfill. Maybe the structure of the class, combined with the mom's expectations and the structure of his school day, was simply too much for him to handle. There could be a number of reasons why this played out as it did. To be sure, there's no real excuse for it - but there could be reasons. I simply do not know.
12:30PM - Prepare milk infusion for bread sauce. Parboil the potatoes and parsnips. Once parboiled, drain and either shake the pan or run the tines of a fork over the sides of the potatoes to rough up the edges. Leave to air dry.
The Nation of Geldbane; Derrek chewed on the words, trying to digest them. It was one thing to run into a confused old man, but for him to be told something like this from a woman not far from his age, made the idea sink in a bit more. It also explained the foreign tone of her voice, but Derrek had never heard of a European country named Geldbane.
Seriously, I believe you can't underestimate what you're doing when you sit down to write. You're not just transferring thoughts to paper, you're re-imaging the world, often replacing reality with something more powerful, meaningful and satisfying.
Members of Parliament, or MPs, are the elected representatives of people in local areas. There are roughly 650 constituencies in the UK, each with an MP that looks after the people – roughly 60,000 to 80,000 people for each MP. What do these MPs actually do?
I got a caprese, and it was excellent. But, honestly...
The Miz Vs Kofi Kingston, next.
Titanic was a ship of supremacy; the classes of human race were divided according to the money they made. No third class passengers were allowed to be on the deck where the first class passengers were lodging. Even the staircase, which led to the first class decks where guarded to ensure no third class passengers sneaks in to satisfy their curiosity. This was the ultimate rule, no two cross cultures were to mingle and this was solely based on the preference of the high society.
RingMaster 31/10/2011
Mix all vinaigrette ingredients together in a bowl; keep on countertop until served. If you have time to mix the vinaigrette earlier in the day, the ingredients can brighten the flavor of winter tomatoes, but this vinaigrette does not need to be made in advance.
Paul will be flying in from Los Angeles this Thursday in time for next Monday’s debate. He is perhaps most famous on this side of the pond for directing The Aristocrats movie. Also on the panel for the Malcolm Hardee Debate will be “the godmother of Scottish comedy” Janey Godley and Show Me the Funny judge and doyenne of Fringe comedy critics Kate Copstick. There will also be a forth, hopefully jaw-dropping panelist who cannot be confirmed nor named until later this week.
The strangling influence of family telling you to do this and not do that is what smothers the potential intelligence in kids and teenagers so they don’t end up smart as adults. We were alone, we were pretty much family over that year but it seemed like you had wised up. I was never perfect. Loneliness seems to be the cost of brains.
Elliott on the other hand has never woken during a thunderstorm (fingers crossed that he's like his dad and likes them, as opposed to Penny and I, as we are admittedly not fans.) His days are filled with crawling and pulling up on any raised surface, so doesn't have time during the night to be bothered by storms. That boy needs his sleep.
And what about the massive promotion of late of MMA (Multiple Martial Arts) tournaments (boxing also of course) where it's ok to put two men/women/children into a ring to beat the bejesus out of each other, yet were I to attack/defend against someone in the street who had done something to upset me, I'll be hauled into the police station, imprisoned, taken to court, imprisoned or fined. Again no one even cares to consider the double standards here.
Stylez’s debut full-length effort The Blackstar (Fontana North/Universal) is that reward. A beastly wallop of pointed intensity, it boasts graceful flow, a sinewy commingling of diverse genres and dynamic prowess intertwined with unforgettable lyrics, evidenced on already-revered tracks such as “Kool Runnin,” “Sugar Cane,” “Mr. Milkman” and more.
Our windows see new things now, different branches from before and the sunrise shoots right through the windscreen. The round bedroom window faces west now and shows us the setting sun, though sunset is far earlier than bedtime!
July 17, 2011
Celebrating the win leads me to my next quick topic:
Wisconsin is significantly more concentrated in manufacturing than the next state on the list, Iowa. Leading the way are other transportation equipment manufacturing (7.15) and dairy product manufacturing (6.24), the latter of which is certainly not a surprise to see high on this list. Notice the big increase in foundries (5.83, up 26.5%) compared to the nation, and the substantial decline in pulp and paper mills (5.82, and 17.6% decline).
Perhaps a scathe will lighten your mood!
I realize that our job is to raise them in the nurture and admonition of the Lord; that we are to live out loud for Jesus in front of them and that we are to equip them in the Word. I also realize they are responsible to God for the choices they make once they become adults.
General Stanley McChrystal had withdrawn American forces from key areas in Afghanistan across from enemy held regions under attack by the Army of Pakistan. We are now told that this allowed those areas to become safe havens for forces formerly operating in Pakistan, who are now enjoying the freedom and hospitality of, not only Afghanistan but are being ignored by the NATO forces in the region.
There was a side trip to Goliad on the way home today (Goliad was the site of a huge massacre of almost 400 Texian soldiers by Santa Anna, which pretty much spurred Sam Houston on to return the favor a few weeks later at San Jacinto.) I was still sick from the night before and groused a bit, but it was very interesting. (Unfortunately, the toddler came down with some lovely diarrhea right about then, so the rest of the trip was somewhat less pleasant.)
The bottom line is that you need healthy fat in your diet, in limited amounts. And it does matter what kind of fat you eat. For cardiovascular health, limit your intake of saturated fat, avoid trans fat, and make sure most of the fat you eat is good fat from fish, nuts, and healthy oils.
I served this with a salad and a cold sauce I made of 1 cup Turkish Youghurt, 1/2 cup unsweetened Apple Sauce, a little bit of crushed Black Pepper, a little bit of chopped Parsley and peeled, diced Cucumber (just mix it in a small bowl).
So this past Saturday, we went to the annual Wag n' Walk. This is our 4th Walk in a row we've attended. The event is a 2 or 4 mile walk benefiting the SPCA for Monterey County. This fundraiser helps our SPCA care for more than 5,500 homeless animals each year. When we get there, we get to enjoy a free breakfast and picnic lunch (that Mom and Aunt V usually share with us), while visiting with other walkers and their pets.
DEPRESSION – For the first year after my divorce, I was happy. I lost weight, I had money, Nathan was a wonderful child, etc. Well, then things changed. I noticed myself crying more and being more lazy and not wanting to do anything. It wasn’t until Nathan asked me one night, “Why you sad, Momma?” I burst into tears! That very next morning I called and made an appointment with my doctor.
I also embossed the circle Marci is on with hearts.
An agent will give you honest advice: if your book is unsaleable, they will tell you. If the book is redeemable, they may be able to tell you how to fix it. If it's just a duff book, they should tell you that, too. If your agent thinks book after book is irredeemable, you might like to get a second opinion - maybe you have a duff agent, or maybe your style has changed and no longer suits your agent. Or maybe you just can't write and need to try a different career.
As an example, something I was talking to a fellow blogger about the other day comes to mind. Every year I am in a panic when it comes to certain vegetables whose seed I have yet to start saving on a regular basis...like onion seed. I often have a real dickens of a time getting my onion seed in a timely manner regardless of how soon I order it and the varieties of storage onions that grow well for us are very limited...there's like three of them. I have started ordering a couple years worth of the seed just in case but onion seed has a pretty short term viability of around 1-2 years after which the germination rate decreases significantly. So I feel the strong need to save my own and relieve myself of this yearly allium hysteria. We want to have seed and food sovereignty.
AW the Alchemist told us in January that the Vermaelen situation was monitored closely and an appearance 6 weeks after against Barcelona was a slight possibility.
I remember the first time I discovered bronzer. It was like a whole new world opened up for me. It was a world where I looked less like Wednesday Adams and more like... I don't know, someone who sees the sun? I like this one from Physicians Formula because I don't like any shimmer in my bronzer. I like to keep it natural looking!
The absolute end of my little bit of alone time every day. The beginning of long days listening to my children complain that they are bored and then proceed to beat the crap out of each other. The end of structured days and the beginning of chaos.
It's not right though, and it never will be; evil is evil, no matter in whose name it is practiced.
My coach tells me to brush those off, to delete them. I do, but those words haunt me, pull out the breath from me, and holler discouragement my way. I realize, too, that as I write a book about dynamic spiritual growth that I’ll be attacked. I shouldn’t be surprised. In fact, it would be better if I laughed.
Jemima Jones Beck
Anyways, the point of all this is that my family got together last weekend to celebrate my grandparent’s 60th anniversary (as I mentioned in the last post).
I wanted a button in the middle of my bow but didn't have any the right color of green. Then I found a clear button and decided to back it with some of the patterned paper I was using. It was a guaranteed perfect match. I punched a circle from my patterned paper and then used SU Crystal Effects to glue the paper to the back of the button. After allowing a little drying time, I found some DMC floss that was a great match with the salmon/orange-ish color in my papers and threaded the button with it.
Next measurement Check: May 2nd, 2012 – note – check back later tonight, I will update before I go to bed with the new numbers…
Almost ten bags of kitsch-be-gone later to the local Goodwill (Nashvillians, the Eastland Goodwill is actually brimming with my cast off goods this month, take advantage of my estate sale gluttony and getcha some), I feel like I might actually just maybe be able to keep my house clean! Matthew was a lot of help ferrying the Glad bags to the drop site solo so I wouldn't try and fish out a record-I-don't-even-like or shoes-I-haven't-worn-in-years for old times' sake. I can't help myself. And yet! For someone who loves throwing parties as much as I do and having people over to the house, what a coup it will be to be able to call up a friend for dinner chez moi without having to cordon off portions of the house as embarrassingly unviewable. Finally, the sentiment of wanting a house that doesn't make me crazy and allow me to constantly misplace things in a tornado of clutter has trumped my attachment to said tornado. And I hope I can keep it up!!
Good Morning ALL - Sorry about the spelling of my site, but hopefully it makes the site distinctive and memorable. I am so fed up hearing bad news in the media, that I believe it is time for us to wake up to GoooodNews each day, and perhaps our day will be influenced in a more positive way if we all woke up to GoooodNews each day.
Hoping to work off some of those darn Girl Scout Cookies!
I wanted to do a mani in honor of my favourite book, Five Quarters of an Orange from my favourite author: Joanne Harris.
Three months and thirty-four books? I don't know if I'll read all of these (in fact, I know I won't because the previous sentence equals a little over two books a day), but I intend to stick to this list for any and all reading pleasure. No matter what.
In a 2008 response to California’s Supreme Court ruling to allow gay marriage, Santorum said, “Is anyone saying same-sex couples can’t love each other? I love my children. I love my friends, my brother. Heck, I even love my mother-in-law. Should we call these relationships marriage, too? Marriage is and always has been more than the acknowledgment of the love between two people.”
There were no further details in the LHJ interview about what exactly Mrs. Obama's cleansing routine involves, but when queried, a White House official elaborated. The First Lady's routine involves eating as much fruits and vegetables as she wants, while eliminating fats/oil, dairy, meat, caffeine, sugar and starch from her diet for a few days at a time, to "clean out her system." The cleanses are not medically supervised, and neither the President nor the Obama daughters participate. And Mrs. Obama has been doing this "for years," according to the White House, though she's not necessarily recommending it for others.
The technique goes something like this: When bright light hits a frog, it freezes. Slowly, you come up behind it and use your hand to grab its back bone, pressing the plump frog-body into the mud. Bullfrogs have strong legs so if you want to keep it, it’s best to hold on tight. Once you have a good grip, lift it out of the mud, toss it in the bag and proceed. It depends on what kind of crowd you’re feeding, but you might need to collect quite a few frogs to fill large appetites.
Know that you can still make requests, I just don't know when I will get around to posting. Also please know that I think of you and your children often. You are never far from my mind and always close to my heart.
By now the potatoes should be all lovely and roasted up, serve over hot potatoes with a glass of red wine.
oh and just a little side note... Monkey & Squirrel is having a Cyber Monday sale today. just my little way of saying thanks to you! just enter HAPPYHOLIDAYS at check out to receive 20% off your entire purchase.
flavour. Quite empty, slightly bluesy. And I felt how
d) Pulling Back: Their side is two goals down and they score to bring the difference back to one
Mayuyu would love it here. You know why? Because it’s HETAAAALIAAAAAA! But more importantly, Italy ranks right up there with Brazil and Scandinavia in total hotties per square kilometer, so even if they don’t have the most successful ____48 group, they’ll definitely have the prettiest. I think the existence of half-Japanese half-Italian girls speaks for itself.
''It's our position in the lawsuit that they are not entitled to do that.''
Fafnir would hang out with Conan--after Dr. Who, I can't really call him a companion--for another five or so issues. He would tend to be overshadowed and outshined by Conan, though; so it's not surprising he didn't stick around. Aside: I had 'outshined' the first time I wrote that last sentence, and the spell check wanted 'outshone.' Which sounds, eh, not as good there, anyway...
far from home. Some children were subjected to abuse, as well as forbidden to express their aboriginal language and culture. She sang this song in 1996 for the first time at the University of Regina in Saskatchewan during the university’s convocation address. It is on her latest CD recording, Running for the Drum.
We called at Cherbourg, and from there proceeded to Queenstown. We left Queenstown at 1:30 in the afternoon of Thursday, April 11. The weather was fair and clear, the ship palatial, the food delicious. Almost everyone was counting the days till we would see the Statue of Liberty.
I still have hopes, dreams and love to give. I’m still alive and intend on living. I am willing to sharing my life again. I have my arms open. I’m wearing my favourite outfit, with my most valued possession on the sleeve. My best features, are the children I share my life with. I know I am loved. I am already happy.
According to the court's summary of the matter, the case involves a woman attempting to hold the police minister partially responsible for her rape, at the age of 13, by a policeman who was out of uniform and on call at the time of the crime.
4They will rebuild the ancient ruins
My son says to tell you that he plays expert on drums and guitar. Show-off. He wants you to say "Oh he's so handsome and good at rock band!"
I originally bought the Bunnies to hang on the wall but as I started to make the wreaths, I decided to wire them inside the center of the wreaths....
Accessories: Spellbinders Labels 20, Cheery Lynn Designs Exotic Butterflies Small, Recollections half pearls, handmade stick pin, seam binding, lace, roses, recycled Prima packaging
Depending on the show, ticket prices for Jazz at the Bistro's summer schedule range from $20 to $30 for adults and $10 to $15 for students. Tickets will go on sale at 10:00 a.m., Tuesday, May 8 via Metrotix.
Here are a few photos taken this past week.
Day Twenty-six April 13
specifically clam chowder & corn chowder
Things get ugly for journo after beauty comments
Pork belly is a surprisingly cheap cut of meat and don't worry about the fat.. It all cooks off after about 3 hours in the oven, so you are left with a very tender and lean piece of meat. Tom used this recipe (Oh Jamie, where would we be without you?)
Brewmaster, Andy Tveekrem, has been a professional brewer for 20 years and prior to this venture has been the Brewmaster at Dogfish Head Craft Brewery in Delaware (2004-2009), Frederick Brewing Company in Maryland (2000-2004), and Great Lakes Brewing Company in Cleveland (1991-2000) (Source: Market Garden Brewery)
We’ll start off with some points the FAO made in the report, then some of their solutions (which, by the way, seem a lot like communism). Then I’ll tell you why I think this report is, pardon the pun, bullshit.
The phenomenon of sahajiya is the greatest danger that leads to deviation from the purity of original teachings. It is all about taking transcendental attainment cheaply. It manifests as a disturbance in society in the form of unqualified persons imitating advanced and exalted standards, either because they are ambitious for cheap adoration or they genuinely believe they are advanced and elevated. Sahajiya is a common pitfall that the sampradaya falls into from time to time. Taking shelter of the instructions of the spiritual master and strictly following them is the only way to stay on track since some of these sahajiya traps are very subtle and pass off easily as desire for expanding ones devotional service to ones Guru. It passes off so seamlessly and is impossible to detect as sahajiya, until after a period of time, disastrous results show up. Phalena parichayate.
"About how we were run out of the last town after you seduced that farmer's daughter?"
Marriage didn’t much change anything in my life or the way I felt about myself and the world, but parenthood certainly had. By the fall of 2005, our old life had been wrapped up in a dirty diaper and tossed in the trash. There were no more evenings in the Make-Out Room shooting pool and drinking margaritas and dancing and then crawling over to the Latin American for shots and then perhaps to the Elbo Room to see bands with names like Double-Jointed Donkey Dick or Death Valley High.
1) Copy this list into your blog or journal, including these instructions.
I love me a nice, dark, and malty porter, and that is what you find in a pint of Cutthroat. I have enjoyed it before, and I will enjoy it again. I felt that I needed to give it the props it deserves. Now this isn't a seasonal, but to some a porter wouldn't qualify as a Spring beer. I beg to differ.
1 head nappa cabbage
Leave in the tin for a few minutes before allowing to cool on a wire rack.
She sits. Silent tears escape while
The one quote that intrigued me the most is a series of quotations near the end that at first glance is a juxtaposed jumble of ideas, but taken as a whole, provide a conclusion to this very “difficult” poem:
Just visit PaperCutz Blog and share your projects with us. And don't forget to visit each DTs, they have created some lovely inspirations for you.
The tracks were a part of the Wilmington and Manchester Railroad which was acquired not long after the accident by the Atlantic Coast Line Railroad. The line later became the Seaboard Coast Line. Later mergers added the line to the thousands of miles of rail owned by CSX which took up these tracks in 1977. Sightings of the light are reported to have ceased around that time.
October 3 @ Lee's Palace (Toronto, Ontario)
garlic cloves (several, sliced very thin)
17.Hollow Eyes
Classes meet, South Philly Free Library, 1700 Broad (Broad & Morris)
So Ogopogo looks at Nessie and says, 'Hey Nessie, hows it goin eh!?' A puzzled Nessie responds 'Och aye Ogopogo! I am the amazing Loch Ness Monster, loved and adored my millions. Very few humans know who you are and they even made a movie about me! Beat that!' To which Ogopogo replies, ' Well, there's a replica of me in a park in Kelowna!'
I request Dorje Shugden to control everything, literally everything, in my world forever and always. I do this with the clear knowledge that his function is to arrange all outer, inner and secret conditions so that they are perfect for our swiftest possible enlightenment. He accomplishes this function on the side of what appears by manipulating what karma ripens and on the side of conception by blessing our mind with the wisdom to understand and realize how things are perfect for our enlightenment. A condition is perfect for our enlightenment because (a) it gives us an opportunity to train our mind in exactly the thing we need to train our mind in to advance to the next stage of the path, and (b) because it reveals to us the truth of the Dharma. Since all other beings are empty, I can request Dorje Shugden to accomplish his function not only for myself, but for all the beings of my dream.
The theme for this month is more powerful than any so far. Quiet time, being strong, infinite supply and spending time with nature were all themes that prepared me for this month. I am a channel for Divine healing power. No idea what that looks like yet but I’m on a journey and the destination is not yet in sight. I’m just trusting that each step is carrying me in the right direction. I trust my intuition a lot more and I’m doing what feels right. I’m no longer choosing to ignore the stuff that doesn’t feel right. I’m not ignoring the logical part of my thinking, but I’m allowing the intuitive part to manifest itself more. Already I am feeling more balanced and much less out of control.
no greater beauty can we imagine
Bury peaches partly peeled
He answered me: “Not man; man once I was,
Humans:
Last week was a blur of all of my favourite things – jazz, Hollywood stars (sadly only in photographic form), beauty products, getting glammed up, watching classic movies, hanging out with fascinating characters. (And all that had happened by Wednesday….).
Let me backtrack a little. The tearoom is located in Cohasset, a picturesque and peaceful-looking town on the South Shore. Sweet and spicy aromas greet you the second you walk into the tearoom. The place is cute and has a relaxed country vibe unlike the fancier hotels in Boston, and is decorated with plenty of beautiful china and quilts. Walls of tea and teatime things are on display for sale, including some novel items like decorated sugar cubes and teatime-themed nightlights. The waitstaff was polite and helpful. At $22 (plus tax & tip) for tea , sandwiches, and sweets, it’s a real deal over the Boston hotels and you’ll leave plenty full.
What would each of you do as president to more deeply engage in Latin America and, importantly, to support the governments and the political parties that support democracy and free markets?
The thing is, as writers we are used to sitting behind our laptops and sweating over every sentence, every word, until we don't think we get it any better. Then we send it out, and although we hope against hope for something positive, we inevitably expect to be rejected. If there is the merest sign of anything positive, we climb up to the nearest rooftop and dance a jig.
Cybermuumy was the most extraordinary day. Don't get me wrong. I LOVED it. But there was that non-stop feeling of having to be Engaged in Lively Talk and looking like you're having a Great Time. And that was hard work.
At the moment the font is still in our home as it is not being dedicated by the bishop until next month when he is also visiting the parish to dedicate a new stained window at the church from which this wood has come from. The font is replacing a stone one which is a little unsteady and so is going to be removed from the church. We have saved a little of this oak to make pop-a-bobbin shuttles with, and estimate that the plinth must have been in the church for at least 100 yrs, so they will be very holy ones!
But on profit of those who don’t live in magnificent mansions – yet, who don’t redecorate with unlimited budgets – yet, who don’t receive requests for photo shoots of your country estate or fifth avenue apartment – yet; for those who look longingly at those perfect pictures and wonder if they will ever ascend to that height of refinement and glamour – I have seven bones to pick and queries to ponder on your behalf.
Hahaha! Just kidding! Did you know that April Fools' Day came about when people celebrated the new year on April 1st, unaware that when Caesar brothers Julius and Augustus added their months to the calendar they changed New Year's Day to January 1st instead?! :) That's your history lesson for the day!
So I had filmed 2/3 of the teaser when I discovered I still had 10 days to get a short into the Virgin Media Shorts Competition. I entered it last year without reading the guidelines of a PG rating. So I figured I liked the challenge, how could I make a short in 10 days that would still stick to my creative needs but would also be ‘family’ or at least PG friendly.
Nearly out of money, and fast running out of steam, she had just enough of both to carry her through Carly’s wedding in Atlanta. If she didn’t score the job designing Kim Renfroe’s wedding dress by the time she returned, Audrey would have to start thinking about throwing in the towel. Perhaps she could rustle up a job working for one of the other design houses. Her stab at venturing out on her own hadn’t been the starship success she’d been convinced that it would be.
We were sent the cutest set of brightly colored ribbons to work with, and I had INTENDED to make more of a topiary piece... however one of Bethney's Ribbonistas beat me to it.. so I went with this instead :)
- even when the storm stops, wait another 30 minutes since the last sound of thunder
There are many internationalists who are happy to betray their countries and nations, but the number of anti-internationalists is growing at a rate which should not be underestimated. Our enemies have no morality and no humanity, and for this reason their cruelty and materialism will not prevail. Incidentally, the defamer of Italy was invited to attend a commemoration in the Netherlands of the Partisan murderer - due to the Partisan meeting natural justice in the Netherlands not long after murdering one of Europe's loyal sons. There will be no mausoleum for the murderer, and his name will not be remembered. The enemies of Europe may be crowing now, but their lies are losing their hypnotic power, and the actions of the likes of NATO will not be tolerated much longer. The free world is awakening, and forbidden truths are being spoken.
there are also special bins for "shoes", "keepsake clothes", "family clothes/knit sweaters", etc. (my grandma- was an amazing knitter and we are very blessed to have dozens of sweaters that she made for my brothers and me, and for all of our children.
Feeding
well, a few years ago i tried to recreate this graphic some clever soul had created – it was a great way to get hands-on experience with an application i seldom used. today, i use this application for fun, something that has nothing to do with project deadlines and racing the clock!
So I’m using my little forum here to get this out. But before I do, I want to make an invitation: Michelle Obama – have lunch with me. I believe that you are a good person and that your intentions to improve kid’s health are good, and I don’t believe that you intend for the media to be too scared to publish pieces that are critical of you. I’m a champion athlete, a trained researcher, and a real live obese woman and I think that a good place to start is for us to have a conversation. Tell me where and when you’d like to have lunch and I’m buying. In the meantime, here’s the piece that the media was too scared to publish:
Now I'm excited to announce that I've signed a contract to publish Mastering Math Facts in print! I'm in the process of revising and updating the book, and I have a core group of teachers who are field-testing the materials now. Third grade teacher Suzy Huff Brooks of the Technically Invisible blog is one of my field-testers, and she's been using the materials with her students. She just posted a great video showing how she conducts her daily math fact drills in her classroom.
“What struck me was what I didn’t find, which was diversity,” said Herting. “When the historical society was founded, it was a private club, so a lot of the images were of upper-class New Englanders. I decided I would populate the archives, so in the future people looking through would find a more diverse group,” Herting said in 2009.
So I began to dream of a history for her, something beyond the confines of that basket balanced on a step. Then one night in our yard, she looked up at the night sky and said her first English word: "moon." Her joy made me believe they had been dear friends from the very beginning of her life. What else could she have seen in China that still inspired her? I looked in her room at her favorite things. Who's to say a turtle, peacock, monkey, panda, and fish weren't part of her life over there? That basket on a step in China became the basket carrying her down a river from claw to paw to wing.
The film cuts back and forth between both stories and you begin to wonder when they will tie them both together. When they finally do reveal the connection, it does also reveal a bit of a twist. Essentially the young boy and his mother is actually Clive Owen as a child. His jail ridden father came back to steal him away and after a bit fight the father falls to his death. The mother then convinces him none of this happened and that it was just a nightmare. So the young Clive Owen writes the story of Hollowface and the even was so traumatic he imagines this creature coming back for him each night. Cut to many years later and now his own daughter finds his story and immediately beings to imagine the creature. A shrink in the film suggests the idea of folie a deux. Where two connected people can experience the same exact psychosis and see the same hallucinations. Through DNA I suppose? I don't know, I'm no doctor. So you can believe that premise or you can believe like some do, that this hollwface is an actual spirit coming back to torment Clive Owen and his family. I like to believe the mental aspect.
I had tried the intarsia type of color knitting years ago and it was a total disaster. I'm hoping with the patience of advanced age (that's a JOKE!) and maybe more knitting skill, I'll be able to tackle this project.
7) "Winnable War". I'll keep my political views to myself and just say that the alliteration is annoyingly aggravating.
"Yes Sarah?"
2010.08.24 Iraq Baqubah 3 13 Three Iraqis are taken out by a Fedayeen suicide bomber.
In Israel meanwhile, during the same parallel period of time, Nadab the son of Jeroboam did evil like his father. He was only able to reign for two years as Basha conspired against him, and killed him. Basha then ruled in Israel. Basha also smote all the house of Jeroboam, fulfilling God’s word through Ahijah. Basha then ruled in Israel for twenty four years, but he also did evil in the sight of God by walking in the ways of Jeroboam.
I would also like to say and extra special "Hello" to my new followers!! Welcome. So very glad you are visiting!! Also a Welcome back to Shelley!! And, to my regulars, "Well, you are the best!" Have a great day! Love you all.
My verse for this past two weeks through SiestaScriptureMemoryTeam is Psalm 63:3 (NIV)
In the forward remarks of the book, I salute my "many friends" from these countries and hope that the words and scenarios in the pages therein give you inspiration and reason to continue fighting for your RIGHT to self-defense and self-determination.
I sat down and rested. Dinner was a microwave meal but halfway through I feel the Crohns making itself known. Had Humira yesterday but this doesn’t kick in until tomorrow.
pocket, and pulled out a fistful of coins. With a gamut of
Attractive...Only to themselves and mom.
I honestly found it mortifying, as a woman and as a music lover. But then again, I would never pursue that kind of lifestyle in any moment or situation, past future and present. Just as I don’t judge people by their careers/jobs/"position in society", I don’t believe musicians are a “different breed” as Pamela Des Barres writes.
It’s enough to make a level-headed guy look like the world’s greatest cynic. Take Stephen Strasburg, the Washington Nationals’ stud pitching prospect who electrified the game in his first handful of starts in his 2010 rookie campaign. As he blew away hitter after hitter, the popular narrative became one of the next Randy Johnson, of Dwight
There is a big question to be dealt with. To what extent should CAMRA lobby for legislation to protect pubs from supermarket competition? If we think that CAMRA should be doing this then it should go for the throat. It should be noisy, controversial, and generally stroppy to get the message across. I’m not convinced that sitting at the top table with government and senior civil servants actually gets us anywhere.Don’t forget that the supermarkets employ armies of lobbyists at Westminster and they are serious opponents.Now, there’s plenty to be said on that issue, much of which I’ve said before. But, if you want to fight the anti-drink lobby, might it not make sense to have the big battalions of Tesco et al on the same side, rather than opening up a war on two fronts? And, realistically, the people who are drinking cask beer in the pub are broadly the same as those who are buying the premium bottled ales from the supermarket. To suggest that someone cracking open a bottle of London Pride that he has got on a 3 for £4 offer while watching Midsomer Murders is doing a VERY BAD THING is likely to lead to your support rapidly withering away.
This was our year to go to Michigan for Christmas. We had such a wonderful time! My dad, Bruno and I took Grace to her first MSU basketball game while my mom stayed home and played with Abby. Grace had so much fun - and so did we! Unfortunately they lost the game but we ate lots of junk food to make up for it!
Then I am paid;
Gospel- means “Good News” and what good news the good news the gospel reading says
But the first 2 - 3K was miserable for me. My knee was killing me as well as the bottom of one foot. I wanted to quit right then and there. So I started making deals with myself - if I could make it 1/2 way, I could get a ride in and still feel ok about myself. Then I started thinking about calling husband to come pick me up....there is a small hill up to and through a park (found out form a lady behind us that there is a family of foxes living in that park - that would have been neat to see!) and I did not think I could make it through that. Got past that obstacle and kept going and all of a sudden I had no pain anywhere!!!!! YAY!!!
Total = 13
I am just so pleased with myself that I wanted to share it with you all.
Danny Boyle (Trainspotting)
Anyway, hello to new blog followers and those of you just dropping in. And thanks for being so awesome.
“these are my brothers and sisters,”
and basically you can use anything you want to but your card must have 3 of 1 thing, 2 of another and 1 of another , so for example. you could use 3 papers, 2 flowers and 1 image. That’s just an example though - it is entirely up to you what you use.
As a teenager Julia survived a suicide pact while her best friend, Rachel, died. Julia’s only escape from her guilt, and her mother’s over-protection, is her imagination. When Adam arrives in the office Julia’s world takes a startling turn as she realises reality can be much more fun than fantasy. Finally she has someone who can help her make the most of her life. But can she allow herself to be truly happy?
Ladle the broth and tortellini into serving bowls. Top with Parmesan cheese and parsley, and serve.
"Today Government is announcing its first assessment of the need for reform of the design intellectual property framework. In May 2011, in his report to the Prime Minister, Professor Hargreaves concluded that design had a “very important contribution to make to growth” to the tune of £33 billion to be precise (and still a growth area!) and yet he was critical of the policy makers whose role in supporting IP in this significant branch of the economy had been neglected. So, the good news for designers is there has been a flurry of activity and ACID welcomed the opportunity to paint the picture of SME reality by providing solid evidence from a diverse set of case studies. These highlighted the often grim problems that design-led companies face. This, we were told, has provided a valuable and credible foundation for future policy in this first IPO assessment. Government plans to publish a formal consultation on how to proceed in late spring 2012".This is accompanied by a comment from ACID’s CEO Dids Macdonald:
"Sorry Bluebelle, I haven't figured out how to make a growth potion yet," Merlin replied.
A lot of people shy away from healthier foods because “they’re so much more expensive than fast food, chips, fill in your excuse here”. But that’s not the case there are so many nutrient-rich foods that are good for you AND your wallet. Take black beans for examples. These little gems are protein and fiber packed, and are a lower calorie option to get your protein than other sources like beef. They can help you lower cholesterol and blood pressure too! And the great thing is you can get a huge bag of dry black beans for less than a bag of Doritos!
14 carat gold bezel set princess cut cluster diamond earrings. total weight .36 carat, appraised at $500
Then he said to the woman…
Today I would like to share with you a creation I made using one of the NEW images by Victoria Case for SCACD Loves Me... This fairy is such a beauty, I really enjoyed coloring her up and playing with her wings so they would pop. Hope you enjoy my creation today!!
4. To Kill a Mockingbird - Harper Lee
Managing a budget is stressful; maybe you’ve had to miss a payment to a creditor or just had an expense pop up. It doesn’t mean you aren’t still a savvy consumer and we want to help you find cheap cash till payday by comparing different loan companies and processing for your loan online….. Read More >>
Heavy, I know, but I find myself thinking about this often.
Of faith in God, repentance, and a glorious second birth.
Vegetable oil, 2 table spoons
We are working on introducing FIELD program modules across the two years, of which this year, they started with Live projects/ The Experiential Learning Programme, that provided students an opportunity to work for companies, apart from the typical internship programme. All of the participating companies have reported a high customer satisfaction. Many of these projects are implemented. Our students continue to work on projects for not-for-profit organizations with similarly great results.
When the Zambian Wildlife Authority had told us they would rather we didn’t try cycle across Kafue National Park, we were hugely fortunate that the infamous Chris McBride came to our rescue. Chris hails from Natal and has loved lions all his life. His two books, The White Lions of Timbabvati and Liontide, testify to this and he has spent the past 10 years running McBride’s Camp in Kafue, a hub of lion activity. McBride’s is a rustic camp of reed-clay rondavels, unfenced and on a raised bank of the Kafue river. Bush-buck, impala, leopard and puku are often in camp as is Gerty, a resident hippo who sent Alex scampering one night while returning to our rondavel.
Have you read this book or seen the movie? What are your thoughts?
$477,000 in grant money for a SF arts group was given to a group....in LA? The audit is ongoing (I assume?).
51. Education of Little Tree, The: Forrest Carter
"In art the man is silent and the image speaks" Pasternak "The duende wounds and the tendency of that wound, which never closes, distinguishes the creative man" Lorca "A poetic image is always a transference of meaning" Lorca"Two conditions are neccesary to give life to an image: form and range of development: a cerebral nucleus and the perspective around it" Lorca"Most 'ordinary people' turn to poetry not for bread, but for cream cakes, if they turn to it at all" Michael Hamburger"People often repeat that English poetry 'begins with a flea and ends with God'. To that I reply that French poetry reverses the process, beginning with God, when it can, to end with love of no matter what" Bonnefoy"the poem posits a special relation between the art of poetry and the phenomena of nature" Michael Hamburger"one of the great criticisms of poets of the past is that they said one thing and did another - a false relation between art and life. I always try to avoid this" Larkin"I believe that poetry is one means of discourse which takes one not into dream, not into clouds but into realities beyond normally observable realities" Christopher Middleton "In that respect 'modern poetry' is no different from poetry of any other period, though the two poles have moved farther apart since Heinrich Heine's lines about the unending battle between 'truth' and 'beauty', 'barbarians' and 'Hellenes', a battle fought out not only between opposing schools of poets and critics, but within every poet who matters, from poem to poem, and from line to line." Michael Hamburger"any successful description in lyrical poetry presupposes a measure of self-identification with the thing described, all Roethke's plant and greenhouse poems tell us something about human nature." Michael Hamburger "modern poetry proves conclusively that our kinship with organic nature can only be repressed, never eradicated. The more it is repressed, the greater its threat to the civilisation that represses it." Michael Hamburger"the poet is not concerned with art but with reality . The poet is human but he is also something more that human - he has cosmic affinities... Poetry is affirmation of reality, no more, no less" Kenneth White"The poet's material has always been nature - human or otherwise - all objects and aspects of our outer environment as well as the 'climate of the soul' and the 'theatre of the emotions' May Swenson"bad or mediocre poets have long tended to have a larger public than good ones" Michael Hamburger"If a true poet could predict what poetry he will be writing next year, or in the next decade, there would be no need for him to write it. In that sense every poem is experimental, or not worth writing" Michael HamburgerThe neccessary interrelationship of beauty and truth in poetry remains tantalizingly paradoxical, if not mysterious; for the 'literalists of the imagination' have been brought up against the knowledge that the peculiar truth of poetry may have to be rendered by fictions, or by what, literally, amounts to lies: and absolutists of the imagination have been brought up against the knowledge that 'it must be human'. The paradox alone remains constant and perennial" Michael Hamburger
Planes, trains, rocket ships.
Anatomy
In the early US, fulling parties were organized where the men stamped the soapy knitted wool into submission. Will Rees would probably have participated in a few such parties.
Cool, right? If you want to read a whole book about assigning dollars to health and the ROI of various health procedures, check out David Cutler's Your Money Or Your Life: Strong Medicine for America's Health. The little thought experiment I just described is adapted from page 15.
nancy Kress
How did Frank Booth put it?
Well crap that is it.....I will post some pics soon.
Admittedly, a few of the essays dragged, but it is tough to go 14-0. This is a fantastic collection of original writing, and it was a perfect interruption to the Civil War epic.
Brother Gruesome hail from Oklahoma City, a place I know nothing about. I saw them play here in Urbana the other night, and I really dug it. They are a guitar and drum duo who play some melodious jams that can also kick your ass. The sound has a good sense of dynamics, and they're able to get away with some actually good stretches of lyric-less music -- which a lot of people can't manage as just a two-person band. I could make comparisons to the likes of No Age and Pink Reason, or perhaps say they have a kind of a Neil Young thing going on, but that is just the impression I got from the gig. Stream and download this, and figure it out for yerself.
This recipe is time consuming, but not difficult. It's cool and refreshing for summer, and sweet enough without being too filling.
You feel sorry for the sad light, don't you? :)
-By hosting Facebook contests
Since I went, my husband would, too. Once hubby’s friend heard my husband was going, he had to go also, or else my hubby would tell everyone at work he was a “pansy”. When her husband ended up going, the wife decided to go because she didn’t want to hike down alone.
Last Friday was the London Rammstein concert, which was brilliant! One thing Rammstein are good at is putting on a cracking show. Pyro, lighting and the other tricks of the trade meant it was a two hour show which just flyed. The band and support band (Deathstars also very good showmen) put on a flaming, diamond dusted, gold show, it was the venue that wasn't up to scratch.﻿
Per diem as well as other expenses incurred
So who were our winners?
all in Chinese.i can't read Chinese too even though i am a Chinese,because
Apple Cinnamon Oatmeal Muffins
NEW YORK -- H&R Block is shifting creative duties on its $155 million account to Publicis Groupe’s Fallon from Omnicom Group’s DDB without a review.
Between the Devil and the Deep Blue Sea, Cab Calloway
Red Sorghum
I have concerns that the pest problems this year will be high due to the extremely mild winter. I also feel that with the extreme lack of snow out west that food prices will be very high this year. No snowpack means No spring meltoff and thus- No water for irrigating crops. That makes my garden top priority this year and that's going to be a challenge, as we are doing more travel this year--kind of a final last "hurrah".
If you aren’t running, consider joining the official Run for Change Cheer Team.
They say they were formed in the scalding lava of Iceland's most active volcano 2,000 years ago. That would account for the Fugazi-inspired hysterics, but not the catchy chorus.
It is welcome that the Department of Health recognises the health benefits of breastfeeding and the savings to the National Health Service. However, the Government has not only failed to meet its obligations under the Global Strategy for Infant and Young Child Feeding, which it supported at the World Health Assembly, it is backtracking on action that had been taken.
5. Travel with Emergency Hydration & Nutrition
Energy Solution (Invention) for Automobiles and (General)
Jeff Bezos, founder and CEO of Amazon.com
I ordered a new RoadID bracelet along with a light and some ankle reflectors so I can feel comfortable running outside again. Since my friend Amanda’s accident, I’ve been a little leary of running outside, but my game is definitely off with just treadmill running. I’ve decided that I’m going to leave the gym to classes only and do my running outside. The weather is getting better for it too.
You can even make the fillings into small balls like fish balls. Then pan fry with some oil before putting them into the pot of soup. Note that for the white tau fu, just pan fry where the fillings were been stuffed.
For my second day project I decided to go with gift bags. I'm mean just like birthday cards, you can never have to many gift bags for your gifts right?!! For the first bag I used a bag off of Plantin Schoolbook cart and cut it fit to page on a 12x24 mat. I assembled my bag and then cut the flower from Flower Shoppe (flower 33 on the overlay, the flower center is 3 on the overlay and the leaf is 43 on the overlay) for my decoration on the bag, I also used Home Decor for the swirl. My flower parts I cut from white paper and just inked the outside of the flower as well as the flower center. I also added some yellow ink to the flower center. It is a nice size bag, not to big and not too small.
At my 1st baby shower I had a very hard time opening gifts (we got mostly baby clothes and a stroller) I was sad because I didnt get to have that for my sweet baby Lijah but I was greatfull for the outpouring of love. At tthe 2nd shower it was also hard because both showers were at the exact same places where they made my Lijah shower(FUNERAL FUNDRAISER) so there were no cute clothes.
The appliqué is added before the quilting.
One more bit of context: By comparison to the 250 kids killed in 2008 by drunk drivers, according to the CDC 756 children aged 1-14 were murdered in 2006, the last year for which they have records. (Go here for data.) Not all of those, of course, were sexual assaults, but I find zero support for your contention that drunk driving is killing 1000% more kids than predators assaulting them. Strictly by the numbers, the latter is a more common problem.
Anyway, we got married in the front garden of her parents house and had the reception in the back garden---the weather gods were kind and, OK, I even cried--well, what do you expect from a guy when he standing there talking to his mates and he turns around to see the most beautiful vision in white walking towards him---I don't know about the rest of you at your wedding or another, but it was breath taking and she was there for me.
Dave Becker has spent the past 20 years lying to people for a living. Fiction seemed like the next logical step. The Faustian Host is his first novel.
Your contribution is most welcome. Please ensure that you include some details of the cemetery in which you took your photographs, and link directly to your post, rather than simply to your blog in general.
The sermons I have seen are unfortunately limited (though I hope to increase this number soon), but the three I have seen are very powerful. “You Will Never See Death” deals with humanity’s inherent fear of death: http://www.desiringgod.org/resource-library/sermons/you-will-never-see-death . “From Bloodlines to Bloodline” was given on MLK weekend of this year, and is a good sermon on racism (coming from the south, where great prejudice can still exist, I find this one especially poignant): http://www.desiringgod.org/resource-library/sermons/from-bloodlines-to-bloodline . One of John Piper’s most famous talks given is called “Don’t Waste Your Life”; a simple, yet relevant message in a culture where it seems the ultimate goal is to retire by 55 and spend the rest of your life playing golf in Florida (this is only the first part, the rest is in the sidebar): http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tyJs95MH8RI
I'll see if I can put together a giveaway for 150!
Why just the other day my fingers betrayed my brain. I left a witty comment on MU’s Barbie blog. To be clear her blog is not always about Barbie, but this post was about seeing Barbie in a new photographic light and the photographs are definitely worth a trip over to her blog for a peek. I just reread my previous sentence and I want to assure you that I’m not implying that the pictures are the only reason to visit her blog, her writing is worth a visit, too. Now back to the original point of this paragraph. It was only when I read MJ’s reply that I realized my fingers typed ‘sense’ when my brain was thinking ‘since.’ No one called me on it, but they may have been too polite to do so. I did my normal self-flagellation over this typo if two letters in the same word can be called a typo.
In Winnie-the-Pooh, it is Eeyore's favourite food...
Anyway, opening the curtains this morning, I would have won my bet, peering past the raindrops on the window, I watched the rain bouncing of the vehicles in the close, beating out the words ‘bank holiday, bank holiday……..
Hi Everyone! ~~Konnichiwa~~
The denomination in and to which I have given my life's work
When asked if there would be a sequel for E.T., Steven Spielberg said that he would never make it. He felt that a sequel would just degrade the original work. Spielberg has, of course, gone on to make many sequels of many of his movies, but still left E.T. as a standalone.
Maybe one song is all we need:
Kinking the Classics
By Chris Mitchell CBN News Middle East Bureau Chief.
- Redesigned Dry Touch Pod: This is a rectangular-shaped pod and is made with 4 layers of microfiber and topped with microfleese. This is great because you don’t have to fold it down or anything.
The scoop-front maternity skirt was everywhere in the Forties and Fifties in a few basic variations.
In 2001 the PlayStation 2 really began to hit it's stride with a tidal wave of hit releases releases. One game that managed to stand out from the crowed was Rockstar's Grand Theft Auto III. While the series had a cult following with the two top-down view games prior and the London 1969 expansion game, GTAIII was the game that rocketed the franchise to juggernaut status that it enjoys to this day.
I was also reminded of a poem I read in high school that really resonated with me, and still does:
Frozen meatballs are another one of my favorite time savers. I've found turkey meatballs and Veggie Patch brand meatless meatballs. Naturally, they're great in spaghetti, and the leftovers make great meatball sandwiches. Today I got out a recipe for Albondigas, a Mexican meatball soup. It calls for chicken broth, but I use vegetable broth, canned tomatoes, chopped celery and onion, and a sliced zucchini and chopped cilantro. I didn't have the zucchini or cilantro, but I did have carrots and kale. I also added a little bit of orzo. Because the kale cooks pretty quickly, I added it last. When it had wilted just a little bit, I removed half of the soup to another pan, and added turkey meatballs to one, and meatless meatballs to the other. Instead of albondigas, I made more of an Italian wedding soup. It satisfied my craving and is delish!
The residents gathered around the dangling Wolf and prepared for her to fall. They had made a human net. And Wolf fell into their arms.
AAM: And let us also speak of what you call NESARA, and what we would refer to as accessing universal funds. And I wish to speak to each and every person’s heart, as well as their minds, this day. Because part of this transition into the higher realms is the acceptance, the anchoring, the allowance of that balance, dear one, between your heart and your mind, between your spiritual and your ego demands, the balance between your fields, your emotional, your mental, your causal, your spiritual.
But bureaucrats in one Taiwanese city did recently dramatically improve pavement sanitation by rewarding with lottery tickets people who handed in bags of dog doo.
Update: Shortly after posting this morning, my ex called me. Which is interesting considering he claims not to read the blog anymore. He was upset that I wrote about this, and wanted to make it clear that nothing ever happened with him and her while we were together. He asked me to take this post down, saying it was a lie. Well, he’s right about one thing. I have no idea what happened with them. It absolutely could have all been very innocent. To be honest, I hope that is the truth. That would be far more in line with the man I thought I was marrying. I’m just here writing about how I’m feeling and what I’m going through. I know that the anger will pass, and I will get over this. But I do not wish ill will on Tina or my ex. What I’m concerned about is me, and my healing process. And posting honestly on this blog is part of that. My intention is never to use this blog as a weapon to hurt anyone. I think the people that have been reading for the past year know that to be true.
So, wish me luck on my weight-loss odyssey. If this doesn't work, nothing will. Except perhaps a gastric band.
To hide my heartbreak I quickly began dating and tried to move on. 3 and half years later and a whole lot of life lessons in between, I found my self back in Orlando, living with my mom and job searching when I realized that Beau lives in Orlando too. After all this time, I still thought of him often and figured now was my chance to tell him so. I did and he felt the same way and here we are back in each others arms, just as much in love, a little more mature and smart enough to realize how lucky we are to have found each other again.
My fourth favorite accessory?
I'm just a girl, my apologies
The afternoon tea we created set the scene for a discussion with the prolific crime writer, Martina Cole on Miss Marple and Agatha Christie. As quintessentially English as the afternoon tea tradition, Miss Marple,in tweed, always unravels the murder as she sips from her china teacup.
Meanwhile, the remaining newcomers attempted to carve out a home in a fierce wilderness, using the tools and weapons of their former world. It wasn’t long before they realized the hope of rebuilding their technologically advanced civilization was a lost cause. The resources they’d brought were finite, and the environment yielded no replacements, especially the fuel and energy needed for their greatest machines. Much of their might was expended against the native animal life, deadly and predatory in nature, as well as combating the elements, which proved exceptionally hazardous. The rotation of the planet led to exceptionally long, cold winters and the erratic moons created erratic tides along the coast of the southern sea, to go with the hurricane strength winds. Blizzards out of the mountains and permafrost where mining might otherwise yield valuable mineral resources made it clear that taming the planet to their own purpose would be a losing proposition.
Level 10: Damage: +10%, Critical Rate: +10%.
I made this birthday card for a neighbor with the poppies in mind.
This time the blog enrty is quite short but I have some more stuff to show you in my next post!
If Stanley Armour, Madelyn and Stanley Ann Dunham were deep cover CIA agents involved in the early development stages of secret projects for MK ULTRA/ Cyborg-Mind Control Programs at HU with Psychologist Dr. William Thetford (Fantasy Perceptions in Children Studies),[71] then Obama’s admitted bizarre childhood mentor, Frank Marshall Davis, cannot simply be dismissed as his “real father” or a “KGB handler.”
STEP 3: Not easy to write a bit ab out me, but let’s give it a try.
9 more principles for building confidence in others:
If you close your mind to an entire genre because you were forced to listen to a small portion of it, or don’t care for a handful of artists… you’re severely limiting yourself. For instance, Darius Rucker (who is another artist featured on Tuskegee) is a very popular country artist. He’s probably one of my favorites as far as newer country singers are concerned. Did you know he was the lead singer for Hootie and the Blowfish? If you don’t know the name there is a link at the bottom to a song that will remind you. So many people are switching genre’s today, if this tunnel vision lasts, I’m afraid you will miss out on so much.
I know I've built these grand to-do lists before, but for some reason this weekend I seem to be extra motivated. Go figure, huh? Maybe it's all the extra sleep I've been getting. :)
That there is more to life
Hope is a state of mind and it is for the most still relatively free. It is the faith in the creation that things will improve or either physically, spiritually and emotionally.
A unique online training and networking opportunity!
Strengths: Super tracking abilities. No human can hide for long.
And I know this just a fantasy, but I cordially invite you to ask why can’t it be? Now can’t do nothing bout the past, but we can do something bout the future that we have. We can make it fast or we can make it last. Every woman queen and every man a king and when those color lines that we can’t see between we just close our eyes and see all black everything.
Where is this all going?
Within a few days, along with being horrifically sick from the chemo, I experienced what to me was a very violent miscarriage. I'll spare you the details.
to start the next chart. For every feather motif in chart 2, there are 2 in chart 3--by the end of chart 3 the stitch count hasn't increased that much, but there are some big increases in some of the rows. Those beautiful eyes—are a hateful 9 stitch increase! And there are 60 feathers, with 60 eyes in chart 3 section of the shawl. A good percentage of the following rounds have net decrease... but 60 X 9!!! 540 increases! That will just about double the stitch count for a while (and the count will be up from the 540—the very first round of chart 3 comes with 30 increases! (and there are several more before the eyes!)
"LOOK!" I said to my boyfriend. He blearily stared at me, smiled. "Huh?" Right. No shirt.
Fresh Whole Fruit (Apples, Oranges, Pears, Bananas, Grapes)
However…..
We know that George didn’t conduct his business by long distance from Victoria. He came to town, and ended up in a famous early image of Maple Tree Square, taken just before the 1886 fire. A 1929 Vancouver Sun interview with Harry Devine, the photographer of the 1886 image below identified the two men standing in the centre of the picture. “The man with his back to the camera is J M Spinks, pioneer realty man, and brother of the late Judge Spinks of Vernon. The bearded gentlemen with the derby hat, light coat and leather leggings is George Byrnes, Vancouver’s first auctioneer”.
This whole Julian Assange, Wikileaks, Operation Payback episode is starting to read like a Larsson novel. I can't help but have an image of some huge, fat, hairy bastard with no social skills, sitting in some basement manipulating everything. 3 massive cheers for whoever is behind Operation Payback.
No other trail in the Greensboro Watershed comes close to having as many power-line crossings as the Blue Heron Trail. I counted eight of them in all. As a consequence, the 3.25-mile, multi-use trail is a series of alternating experiences of bright sun and dark woods, lake views and open field. Along the way, the trail meanders over slightly rolling terrain, and mountain bikers will enjoy the numerous gullies that intersect the path, offering precipitous dips and rises.
A Birthday I shan't forget.
For the sweet little talks,
Since childhood, Sabriel has lived outside the walls of the Old Kingdom, away from the power of Free Magic, and away from the Dead who refuse to stay dead. But now her father, the Mage Abhorson, is missing, and Sabriel must cross into that world to find him. With Mogget, whose feline form hides a powerful, perhaps malevolent spirit, and Touchstone, a young Charter Mage, Sabriel travels deep into the Old Kingdom. There she confronts an evil that threatens much more than her life, and comes face to face with her own hidden destiny.
﻿I love photos of people that show personality. And there's lots of personality in this one - all that gel, that awesome top, the pasty paunch with belly diamond and tattoo, and the fag. (I'm not a smoker, don't endorse smoking, etc., etc, but cigarettes do something for me in photographs.) This is not a picture of Sasha and Michael. I don't know who it is, but I love it - just seedy enough.
Hotel Seri Malaysia has a knack for positioning its hotels at a location which appear to be a bit far away from the town or main attraction and this is the case with Hotel Seri Malaysia Melaka in Ayer Keroh, some 5km from the Ayer Keroh toll plaza and adjacent to the Ayer Keroh Arch.
with the view of Central Park:
06 Cantonese Boy
5)I have been doing quite a bit of reading lately, and when I get back I'll start blogging about some of the books I've read. Big hint: two words for you: Steam. Punk.
anybody want to join us? we have nine more weeks to go. have some weight loss fun (okay. i’m stretching the truth…). get some accountability. get some motivation. send me a comment or find me on facebook and we’ll get you signed up.
'This one! This one! Its just the right size!'
We have never had one bill that frightened us, never had to cut corners or go without to get the rent paid.
As with other electric models, the Z.E. is easy to get accustomed to, in terms of operating – once the green signage lights up on the dashboard, you are good to go.
Color: Golden
Factor A solid solid
There are some things that you learn in college that you will use for the rest of your life. Yet, they may not be things that you would learn from a class that you are taking. These life skills will help you when it's time for you to start your career, and even get a job. There are plenty of things that you can take away from the classroom besides the lessons that are on the syllabus.
Firstly, I started buying scratchies.
Panel two was a four-point timeline, panel three was five important facts about Rosa Parks, and panel four was a two-paragraph essay, compiling everything she'd learned into prose form. We had a note from her teacher that THREE paragraphs would get you an outstanding grade, so Rosie went for three.
“Fifth, I will take some part in it, aside from singing.
I never thought much about CGI or what you could do in animation compared to ‘real live’ films. However, Jaime has converted me into believing that it really could look awesome done this way.
With a per capita GDP that places among the world’s top five, UAE’s wealth is undeniable. But property laws were only established recently, although they have quickly evolved into a model modern system.
5. Sigh, Cry, Almost Die
As you’ve no doubt heard if you follow patent law, the Senate has passed the House version of the America Invents Act, and the bill now only awaits the President’s signature to become law. Readers with time on their hands can find the entire House bill here.
(Pictures from google)
She is openly geek, so the Geek Award is now officially presented to her.
*J really isn't this bad, though I have been banned from doing any touch-up painting on surfaces at eye-level. My evil plan to get out of tedious detail-work by pretending to do things poorly is working…
the lips from the mouth desire to
I did break the box on my webcam but I'm having problems finding it on my laptop so I'll just show you some highlights.
2 TBS lemon juice
is madonna to my spiraling desire,
One new feature going forward:
So... now it's time.
It’s easy to see why Dave Thornton has become a familiar face on Channel 10’s The Project – he’s the kind of flannelette-wearing, well-coiffed, skinny-leg-jeans wearing fresh ‘personality’ who bounces up on screen and gets things moving. He is the archetypal early-30s Australian man, evidenced by his comedy show The Some of All the Parts, which has that somewhat ubiquitous adult-male phenomenon of being obsessed with the dorky toys you loved as a kid.
Women of Achievement by Benjamin Brawley (in the public domain)
This evening I had my friend Jade over for a creative makeup session. Over the weekend I was working in Peaches and Cream for the first time in a while, and seeing all of the amazing makeup that the girls were creating really got me itching to do something colourful.
Come visit the The Crafty Cafe. Sit right down and sip your favorite beverage while you fill your plate with inspiration. On our menu you will find a delicious variety of inspiration and challenges to fit any level of crafter. We will offer a potpourri of crafting adventures to choose from. If there is a special craft that we have not covered the way you will find lip licking give aways to tantalize you taste buds. Thanks again for stopping in, our challenges will be posted every Friday, just in time for weekend madness. See you then.
blessing pours down
Now, in all my years dealing with UPS, I have had late packages, I have had damaged packages, but never LOST packages. Never.
Is this you? I hope not. Waiting doesn’t have to be a negative time of your day. In fact, the next time you wait – for anything – try one of these few ideas.
-It’s a social media site that’s way more fun than Twitter or Facebook.
Cashews few broken
Why not try keeping the significator off to one side, somewhere where it can be kept in view throughout the reading, and then see how that card 'relates' to the other cards in the spread?
It was a bright, sunny day out. I lifted my sunglasses off the top of my head and put them on. I guess there was something about those sunglasses that jogged Grandma’s memory. For a brief moment, the old Grandma I knew and loved looked at me, eyes alert. She turned back to Debbie and said, “That looks like Danita.”
A growing number of conservative Christians are explicitly and self-critically acknowledging that to be “pro-life” must mean more than opposing abortion. The head of World Vision in the United States, Richard Stearns, begins his fascinating book, “The Hole in Our Gospel,” with an account of a visit a decade ago to Uganda, where he met a 13-year-old AIDS orphan who was raising his younger brothers by himself.“What sickened me most was this question: where was the Church?” he writes. “Where were the followers of Jesus Christ in the midst of perhaps the greatest humanitarian crisis of our time?
Every woman was made for a relationship with God. When a woman uses sex to try to get a man to pay attention to her, to love her and to commit to her long-term, it usually fails. Sex doesn’t make a man who doesn’t want to marry suddenly want to marry. Without a Christian worldview, the woman may not realize how to tell a good man from a bad man, and how to drive a relationship through to marriage. If a woman has sex with enough men, she may develop a low opinion of the goodness and reliability of men. She may think that she is handling men correctly and that the relationship should work out. But the trauma from failed relationships with unreliable men can cause her to suffer emotionally, and even to doubt God’s existence or goodness. Christian men should therefore avoid casual sex so that they don’t push women away from relationships with God.
"I have spent a great deal of time seeking for an authoritative ruling as to the kind of vessel from which beer should be drunk. Should it be drunk from a glass or from a tankard? What kind of glass or tankard should it be drunk from? Should it first be poured into a jug or should it be transferred direct from cask or bottle to the drinking vessel?
It has really been a weird few days with more ups and downs than I normally have.
There was a Taco Mac in the area as well, which pretty much sealed the deal of hideaways I would spend time in if I lived back in the ATL. Decatur was just a great little spot in the many pockets of bars in the Atlanta area. The weather was a good 20 degrees lower than it was in Houston, nice. We got out of Decatur and made it home to try a few more brews we picked up, then to keep it moving on to Buffalo. But that's for another post. Holla.
- Derek H.
Mullen's Blog: My View on 'Don't Ask Don't Tell'
To ask questions, without having to have answers.
Watch the rain cling to the children’s trampoline.
I remember once going for a Parent-Teacher conference with my dad. The teacher took out the report card. There were three columns – one for each of the first 3 quarters of the year. And there were 9 rows. One for each of the 9 subjects we were subjected to learning. Each quarter had a corresponding subject and each of these little had a grade. Anything below a 50 was a FAIL. Therefore there were 27 grades in total. (Each subject had three grades mentioned). Anything that was a FAIL was underlined in RED. The bitch was the teachers would wait for the parents to come and THEN fucking underline it in red. I remember sitting there, next to my dad, watching the report card. She started underlining, and just kept on underlining. I don’t remember how many were red, but guaranteed it was over 50% of all the grades. I guess she was trying to make a POINT. But little did she know the temper of the man at the side of me. I kid you not, I almost passed out in fear. I was like, “this is it, I am fucked”.
“The history of the American Negro is the history of this strife,—this longing to attain self-conscious manhood, to merge his double self into a better and truer self. In this merging he wishes neither of the older selves to be lost. He would not Africanize America, for America has too much to teach the world and Africa. He would not bleach his Negro soul in a flood of white Americanism, for he knows that Negro blood has a message for the world. He simply wishes to make it possible for a man to be both a Negro and an American, without being cursed and spit upon by his fellows, without having the doors of Opportunity closed roughly in his face”.
Minion1: My mate is 24 and he just had a heart valve replaced, like he almost died. The doctor told him he had to be careful with alcohol and go slowly. He like asked the doctor if it was ok to like top up his IV drip with like beer for a starter...
This card was extremely easy to color. NO shading, no shadowing and no blending! Just quick and easy coloring and I love it!
Laura: "I've done my best to forget it."
We're on a redeye. I can't sleep.
Pseudoroegneria spicata ssp. spicata (Bluebunch Wheatgrass)
Jesse: God, I’m sorry, is it…is it really that bad? It’s not, right?
Begin first of all with the expression of love of self. Remove all the beliefs, the issues, doubts, patterns and thoughts that stand in the way of you truly loving yourself and being grateful for who you are. Discover all the ways that you have suppressed a feeling of genuine love and respect for yourself. If this is an emotion or concept that is difficult to feel or express, begin with the simple state of gratitude. Be grateful for who you are and for the beauty that is in this world, in nature, animals, and small children. Then begin to expand that feeling and embrace more and more of the collective with deep appreciation and the expression of love.
Put mine buried, outcast,
It was a good sleep. This one had an exhilarating dream. It was surely a sign from Hircine, my shadowy lord of the hunt. Rajiir found himself in the form of a great wolf, bounding through the wilds of Skyrim. I ran through the mountains, climbing ever higher until I reached the spot where I had stood to look out over Dawnstar earlier that day. I felt the soil and snow beneath my great paws. I felt a connection to the wilds that I had never before experienced. It was incredible. I was filled with a purpose, and my great wolf form padded out towards the ruins on the other side of Dawnstar. I ran fast in this new form, and I reached my goal in no time. There I stood outside an ancient Dwemer ruin. Beneath me I saw vague, wisp-like shadows moving all around. I could not detect their forms, but I knew they were enemies. They smelled like arrogance and death. As I charged down the slopes, I could practically taste the blood of the shadows. I could smell the excitement of the hunt. As I leaped at the first bandit, I was woken from my dream. It had to be a sign from Hircine. I was sure of it.
Geoffrey: Well, I can always try.Barbara ... Babs ... Missy ... Sally – don't get me wrong – my sympathies are with you in the grand scheme of this little Warner Brothers drama. But your crazy, murderous, obnoxious, implacable husband is right, here: If you're an artist – heck, even if you're not an artist, but merely a person of integrity – you can't shove something out, to which you feel no sense of attachment or commitment, on the hope or assumption that no one will recognize its inauthenticity or feel its counterfeitness and that people will clamour to buy it, blinded by its slick, shiny veneer.
My “stuff” has been coming up like vomit, unexpected, and leaving me dizzy. When I was 14, one of my best friends took her life, and then her brother 2 years later. It haunted me in my adolescence for a very long time. I am dreaming about Jenny again, and I am yelling and begging her not to leave me…and she is telling me…it hurts to bad to stay….
It appears that a local seafood restaurant may soon return to old tricks, ready to stir up a hornet's nest of controversy with another blacklisted seafood dinner. But this dinner is sure to raise far more outcry than the previous one. There will certainly be loud cries of outrage, as well as renewed calls for boycotts, and National Geographic may be partially responsible for this matter.
We're still fairly busy, as we have the whole getting ready for Hallowe'en thing going on, and we will be out at the Community Center for a free Hallowe'en party and haunted house. The Nestling Sparrow has been practicing being a ghost and scaring people. We got him a pirate outfit, but I think he has decided to be a ghost pirate ("Arrrrrr! Boooo! Did I scare you? Did I scare you?"). The Fledgling Sparrow is dressing up in my Ren Faire outfit. She doesn't have the norks to fill the bodice out, but what can you do?
There are lots of ideas being circulated. I’ve put forward the idea that we could co opt the US legal defence against obscenity that is phrased as ‘redeeming social significance’ – I think redeeming social significance should immunize any cultural act against prosecution for copyright infringement. People talk about a digital copyright exchange and that would be a step in the right direction, as would term reduction.
but life was shifty, that was true,
As a nurse working in a PCT I am obliged to take part in one of the much maligned prior approval schemes that are popping up all over the place to manage the demand for healthcare. ‘Low priority’ treatments such as removal of non cancerous skin lesions and varicose vein surgery are judged against a set of criteria set by a panel of doctors and approval is given or not for surgery to take place. What strikes me most about the way in which cases are presented is the extent to which GPs and surgeons struggle to tell patients that their problems don’t quite meet the criteria. Often they will write that the patients ‘wants this surgery performed’, and I am left wondering; yes, but do you think it needs to be performed.
A few months ago, the lad came home with a wild ducks. Last night we ate them, slow cooked for 3 hours in a cooker, with orange, redcurrant jelly, and pinot. It was amaaazing, and for wild ducks we got alot of meat from the bones. But what to do with the bones!
And the maker of rhymes on the deck who is going to die
Hi, it's great to be here on Grippedintobooks, thanks for having me! As my guest post today, I’ve been asked to recommend some teen reads.
You can get your copy from Amazon.
It had been 45 years since I last saw Ahmet Yilmaz. We shared a year at Plainview High School in 1965-66 when he arrived as an exchange student from Turkey. Ahmet was placed through the American Field Service, originally a program for ambulance drivers in World War I that morphed into a student exchange. In his year, 1500 students from around the world came to the United States to “connect lives and share cultures”.
Almost half the abortions that occur in North America are repeat abortions.
When I joined Stampin Up eight years ago, I'll be honest, I did it for the discount. At time time the Starter Kit was being offered for 20% off and I was psyched! Today, SU is offering the Starter Kit for just $87.50. That's a whooping 50% off and it comes with $310 worth of stamps, accessories and business supplies! Plus shipping on the Starter Kit is FREE. No wonder they're calling it the Simply Amazing Promotion!
Liberty Leading the People
With as strong and harsh a first session as I had experienced, I expected others to relate similar tales, but to my surprise, most described their own sessions as mellow and pleasurable and even commented on how weak the Ayahuasca mixture seemed! It is one of the mysteries of the brew that it is so unpredictable in how it affects one person as opposed to another, even with the same mixture during the same ceremony. The shamans teach that this is because Ayahuasca is a Spirit being that works in a teaching and healing mode with each person and gives that person exactly what they need at that time. As each of us is different, the manifested effects are also vastly different from one to another participant.
Please feel free to share, drop me a comment, follow my blog and click on your social media site of preference. Follow me on Twitter: @mlinares10
I squint and look away.
is a statement made by me dependent on my positions, my points of view
From the beginning, the central objectives of this war have been to seize control of Libya’s oil reserves, the largest on the African continent, and carry out an imperialist show of force as a means of suppressing and diverting the mass popular movements that only months earlier had toppled the US- and NATO-backed regimes of Mubarak in Egypt and Ben Ali in Tunisia.
Life sometimes got in the way of this collaboration, so instead of posting a chapter every week, we went through a long hiatus where the authors suffered variously from cancer, death of a family member, house flooding, job loss, but we picked right up where we left off, and now this experimental novel is finished!
Any pain involved in facing our issues is well worth the effort in the end. When we face our problems instead of avoiding them, we free our energy and transform ourselves from people who run away into people who move enthusiastically forward.
But there was no mistake. These boys belonged here, at my house. And I had to deal with the situation.
There is still space, though these classes are filling up quickly. Contact Kris right away to get added to either the Jan. 23 or 24th class.
8) A Passionately Favorite Version of the REAL Doctor Who
I told my best friend I just feel different. More relaxed, less anxious. That’s when she reminded me that I’d been through a near death experience – at least emotionally – in December.
involvement is of note in this symphony, because Bruckner
As the moment of your awakening approaches, many of you are feeling that continuing to hold the Light is draining your energy, because despite your faith you still have doubts and anxieties about the inevitability of this great event. This is very understandable because you have become accustomed to the disappointment of missed opportunities, missed meetings, and unrealized events or occurrences to which you had been looking forward with eager expectation. And you fear that you will once again be disappointed.
shipping:
These are the kinds of pictures we get sent home from day care. I know Kai thinks about Camille. Sometimes they are photos of our family with her in it, sometimes just her by herself, and this is the more recent one....the title they wrote when they asked him what he drew. They didn't give it to me for a while, but Kai asked me where it was and I told them that he is free to talk and draw and communicate in any form he wants to about his sister. I am just glad that he thinks of her. Like I said, It is his reality too. I sure do love my boy...and my girl. ﻿
Recognizing that the two five-ton military trucks directly to his rear were falling behind, Tanner dropped his speed. The convoy tightened as the two big trucks regained the distance they had lost.
Just...me.
A:�On their foreheads.
Monsoon Spice is nothing short of perfection and her recipes are all worth devouring into. Her moong and spring onion dal, one of my absolute favs, still saves me on a rainy day and I have bookmarked quite a few other recipes to try, with the mirch ka achar (seriously, I'm drooling just thinking about it) topping the list. So imagine my delight when Sia asked me if I could do a guest post for Monsoon Spice while she was holidaying in India. Of course I wasn't gonna pass and so here I am with a delicious caramel pear cake which is divine in taste and EASY to make.
He is now on antibiotics, special creams, piriton and antiseptic baths and he has been referred to the Children's Allergy Clinic where Little P is a patient. The chances of him having allergies and developing asthma are high but we will have to wait and see.
Some sort of parroty bird with subdued, hushed colors, a parrot, long tailed, flaps a burst of speed and tucks wings in again and roll and curves in front of the van, under the power lines, over a bit of wire fencing, into the bush. Another follows. Riding the wind gusts, gusts you could see on the grass, can see, wow, really see, pushing the tops of the trees around. Must be a male, thinks E@L of the bird, but then why in pairs, why one chasing the other? Love or is it jealousy? Such subtle hues for a parrot, rosella, parakeet, whatever you call them (E@L is not an ornithologist either) they're usually brightly feathered. Not this lot. Must be British. None of that color stuff! Maybe they were pigeons.
“And then I’m stuck doing all this prep work, coming out there, giving you an estimate, and you are NEVER going to hire me!”
Woke up to a chilly morning today and set out for the 10 mile ride. Felt great for the first 10 minutes and the speed readings were much higher at the start and had me congratulating myself on swapping out the tires, didn’t seem windy at all and I was quickly hitting the big gears.
So delicious! Were we full?? Beyond that, I think!!! LOL!! But, we had a great day and the time went by quick. I had us on a schedule to fit everything in!! And, what was Lucy during this time? She was playing SPY!!!!
I’m still waiting to get Papadol! episode three and it looks like the ratings aren’t in for it yet, either.
For a movie that cost $100,000 (!!!) to make, I guess it got the most out of its money, but that still doesn't make it any good. In fact, I'd think someone had some change coming, after all was said and done. If you make a zombie movie, should the audience be thinking about what else could have been done with all that money?
Till I found myself in the Jeevanjee Gardens smoking zone on Wednesday, that story was a figment of my memory. My cigarette was nearly burnt halfway when some dude walked up to me. In my head, I knew he wanted to borrow one; smokers are generous people. I gladly offered him one so he’d leave me alone. He didn’t. Now he was staring at me funny. So I asked,
I know it’s wrong – wrong of me to suddenly flip the switch on our friendship with overly aggressive flirty behavior – which mind you, I was keeping under control until his mutual attention started pumping me and my game up. Oh lord, I just claimed to have game.
~ Kelly ~
Grab the button. Copy the code under the button in my sidebar and paste it into an HTML Java Script element on your own sidebar to let all your friends know you're joining in. This is a great way to encourage your own readers to begin as well - to develop a more thankful heart.
In Boston, protesters set up an encampment across the street from the Federal Reserve Building.
“I think most of them would come back in a heartbeat if they could,” says Derrick Romney, who says he loves the small town life of Colonia Juarez.
Best Locations for Vacation Rental Value
public administration from
1/3 Cup Pecan Pieces, Toasted
Through your heart and lungs
Thrills and Chills!, July 31 and Aug 1
Understanding a character is vital. Films just don’t do it for me for that reason. Something gets lost in the translation*, something that allows us to see as the character is seeing. Maybe this is why I don’t get attached as much to movies (or maybe it’s just that I don’t watch that many). In a film, characters are so clearly other people, and their thoughts are hidden from us.
From there we needed a stand.... and this girl was surprisingly heavy.
I will always entice you with the wonders of the world… my friend Sophie has shared with me some things to remind me that I still have a lot to offer other people and do good.. maybe even great things still…. and when she comes here next month I am sure I will be revitalized from her visit…. Sophie is the last of the great courtesans… and trains them.. and she ALWAYS leaves her (I was going to say man.. but maybe lover is a better term).. but she always leaves those whose life she has touched feeling so much greater than when you first meet or encounter her….. While I was never Sophie’s client… we did meet and have some very special time together many many year ago.. and have stayed friends since…. she always brought joy into my life and our conversation on Monday was no exception.. one day I should write a post .. or two.. or TEN.. to let you know this woman I admire so much.. and like as a good friend… I wish you could meet her.. but she will be in Vegas during the 6-8 weeks she will be in the USA.. and I have asked her to at least visit your club and see you in person.. then she can judge for herself if I have been fool or not…I have insisted that she not introduce herself to you as I do not want you to feel .. well intimidated in any way… she can do that to other women.. not only because of her beauty.. but her poise as well…. I saw her on skype.. and I am telling you Joey… I do not think she looks like she has ages at all… truly remarkable actually… and intelligent… ohh my… sadly she never had children … so she may get lonely in later years.. of course I had children and I am lonely now… so what is the difference..
The homeless man said he was laying on the beach at night and watched a turtle lay her eggs. He was hungry so when the turtle went back into the ocean, he dug up the nest and ate the eggs. Kai watched him squeeze lime onto an egg and eat it right before his eyes. So I'm pretty sure that's why he was worried about this mommy turtle.
Here is how to enter:
If you are looking for the best type of Mizuno running shoes for overpronators, motion control running shoes are ideal for you because these shoes are specifically designed to correct the problems with flat foot. These shoes basically have a medial post in the sole and there is more cushioning and supports the low arches of your foot. Some of Mizuno shoes that are designed for flatfooted runners are the Mizuno Wave Renegade 4 and Mizuno Wave Alchemy 9.
500g shortcrust pastry
– Kathy & Rodney H.
The Blaze Boom Bike Band – a unique new mobile bike-based sound system and accompanying street performance band. Blaze is a youth led creative project for Lancashire, Blackpool and the Fylde Coast that is part of WE PLAY, The North West cultural legacy programme for London 2012 Olympic and Paralympic Games. The Boom Bike was created by artist Dan Fox, and commissioned by Blaze young producers in 2010. The Boom Bike Band is made up of talented young musicians working with More Music, based in Morecambe.
London
But national polls are chimeras, finally. Presidents are elected state-by-state. Come September, it’s the state polls of likely voters that matters. Reapportionment has shifted critical electoral votes to red states, favoring Romney. Taking the states of Ohio, North Carolina, Virginia, and Florida are keys to a Romney victory (presuming he retains McCain’s states from 2008, as well he should).
well we had our first meeting today with our home builder and it went pretty well. we discussed with him the types of finishes that we want, showed him the floor plan and the house that we like, and talked to him about how the process actually works. from what i understand, he will give us an overall budget with individual budgets for each thing. we will have a flooring budget, lighting budget, cabinetry budget, etc. because a lot of the things we like are different than the normal custom build, he said that we will have the flexibility to purchase a lot of the stuff from places that we choose. of course he does have vendors that he will use for plumbing, electric, counter tops, cabinetry. one great thing that is going to save us a lot of money is the fact that carol, my amazing mother in law, sells flooring. this is going to save us tonnnsssss of money when building since we will be able to get all of the flooring at cost (we plan on doing wood for the downstairs and carpet for the upstairs). t
After a more than decade-long break from educational endeavors, I got back on the path to getting my degree at the beginning of this year. I’m nearing the end of my third semester and am so very thankful for online classes. They make it possible to continue working 50-60 hours a week while still gettin’ me some learnin’. I can view lectures, complete homework, and take tests online from anywhere I happen to be.
The IPKat -- an enthusiastic trade mark academic and long-term International Trademark Association (INTA) devotee -- has just been perusing the Call For Participants: Second Annual INTA Trademark Scholarship Symposium. This reads as follows, in relevant part:
I almost got scammed.
You want to focus on upper body Yoga exercises that help to increase blood flow to the breast tissue. This also allows the lymphatic system to work. The more active you are the more you help your body detoxify itself. Breast tissue is made up of milk producing glands, ducts that carry milk, fatty tissue, blood vessels, and lymphatic vessels. By moving you help stimulate circulation which is essential for prevention.
Now, that may not be possible and you’re absolutely right that, as I said, Social Security is not the primary driver of our long-term deficits and debt. On the other hand, we do want to make sure that Social Security is going to be there for the next generations, and if there is a reasonable deal to be had on it, it is one that I’m willing to pursue.
Oscar Peterson – Piano
The annual Muskogee Azalea Festival is one of the finest events of its kind in the world. It runs from April 1st - April 30th, but this year the blooms have arrived early!
Create some eco energy.... see what can be arranged.
Archivers proved a few days too late! I knew this design from LYB
Quite a few of the chickens had black marks on their combs most probably a result of a virus (a pox on their combs) or because of frostbite. If you ever look at the combs of the birds that do well in our northern winters (New Hampshire Reds, Rhode Island Reds, Ambers, etc) you’ll see they have combs that are smaller and flatter than the more outrageous combs. A frost bitten comb is a comb that will eventually fall off. It’s not a pretty sight. Apparently our hardy birds are willing to give up the bling in order to keep what little they have.
We go straight to Las Casas Filipinas de Acuzar. Old houses from other places, like Binondo Manila, Lubao Pampanga and many other famous filipinos in 19th centuries were rebuilt and preserve here in the compound of Acuzar Family.
i about died laughing.
really excited.
Looks lost over a disenchanted day
It’s very tempting in this ‘conversation age’ to spend valuable energy and marketing budget talking to fans or advocates of your brand.
Though many welcomed the disqualification of some of the candidates already blocked, the effect is that, of 23 candidates who appeared to have gathered the requisite amount of support, at least 11 have been disqualified, or nearly half. This seems a bit like the regular rule manipulation of the old regime, which was used to guarantee the "right" people always won. It helps Amr Moussa and Abdel Moneim Abul-Futuh, but it may strike many as a curious approach to democracy.
Meanwhile I made the caramel marscapone frosting. This cake has to sit in the refrigerator overnight to let the meringues soften and my cake plate is too large to fit in the refrigerator with everything else in there. I decided to cover a piece of cardboard with aluminum foil and transfer the cake to the fancy plate in the morning. Bad idea, the cake stuck to the foil….because I put some frosting on the foil to anchor the meringue.
Roshon Fegan & Chelsie Hightower – Viennese Waltz
Mint will classify your expenses and income as it comes into your bank accounts, and/or flows out of your credit card accounts. Sometimes you might need to reclassify one or two because what mint chose isn’t the best description.
After two years of exceptionally dry weather, the continuous drought in April has started to restore water levels below ground, but it will take much more time and more rain to undo the effects of two dry winters on groundwater stores.
Overshadowed
1 stretched
deep the wolf
Well hello there dear blogmates. I hope everyone is well and having a good week. My week has been much better I am glad to say.
An Evening with Mr. Ravindra Chamaria
Eating & Drinking Sydney will be released in Australia on September 1, 2011 with a recommended retail price of $29.95. An iPhone app will be made available shortly afterwards.
Ages: 6-10
Fear gave way to terror when a skeletal hand, bits of rotting flesh clinging tenuously to it, suddenly burst free from the earth. Bony fingers latched onto his arm and began to pull him. A silent scream froze within his chest.Steve bolted upright in the bed. He was shivering from the chill of the cold perspiration upon his body. The frozen scream escaped, "Eddie, forgive me!"
Even though this book is categorized as a Middle Grade book, I believe its a story for those who are accomplished readers because Lauren's writing is full of challenging vocabulary. I would recommend this book to readers of all walks of life, both the young and the old will find something special about this book. If you enjoy a story crammed full of magic, adventure and fantasy, that reads like a modern day fairytale, this book will be the perfect one to warm your heart. Parents, this is the perfect bedtime read aloud for children!
Aprilynne Pike has developed the kind of villain that you love to hate. Klea, a rogue fall faerie, is terrifyingly evil and just one plan scary faerie! Not the kind of person I would like to have as an enemy!
Amanpour: the pundits love you but
Stat-wise, it has lots of Defense and Sp Defense, and not much else, not even a lot of HP (only 20 base HP in fact)
Good Luck.
Unfortunately, Dave has a rash and thinks he had encountered some bed bugs while there. :x ba ha ha ha. I just fed him some Benadryl. Boyfriend be sleepy & hush. Men are so cranky when they have an 'illness'.
Mine anger was kindled against the shepherds, and I punished the goats: for the LORD of hosts hath visited his flock the house of Judah, and hath made them as his goodly horse in the battle.
After a full on weekend of writing, I've more or less completed my screenplay for Script Frenzy.
You are so sweet!!!
And now that Gnostic Gospels and other texts have come to light. The Heretics have their say. Now people can choose their truth—a truth that has seeped through the cracks over the years, the truth that was once considered a huge secret. It is now a choice, a personal matter, rather than a political choice. Now wonder if we really wanted to know, if we are really ready for the responsibility.
Next up are the nail polishes in Attraction, Distraction, Tentation, and Frisson.
Many people ask me how I celebrate when completing a manuscript or when a book goes to print! For me, that’s really two questions in one because I celebrate differently for each occasion.
If it says good up to age 5, be ready for your kid to figure it out before age 3. I don’t know what kind of stupid kids they test the childproof devices on, but Anna could bypass them with ease. Seriously, she was like a spy defeating the security systems of a foreign embassy. All child proofing efforts only gave my child a project. Those door handle things, I had friends who could not get out of my apartment, but it took Anna just a couple minutes to figure out.
Jormungand ep. 3
in fulfillment of the Scriptures;
If you’re planning to ingest the salad immediately, mix everything up and serve. If you’re not quite ready to serve, mix all vegetables and cranberries, but wait on the Feta and the dressing (and croutons, if you intend to use them). The Feta is salty and will drain water out of the veggies and into the salad bowl, the dressing will make everything soggy eventually, especially the croutons.
Or maybe, maybe, the littlest gayer was going to win, but because someone pointed out Sir Simon had fixed it he had to fix it the other way so that we wouldn't know he'd fixed it?
Do not force ideas or anything else on yourself. Don’t let others cram their visions of what is “good or acceptable” down your throat.
South Africa’s Leading Research and Policy Organisation
We had these memory cards out at Jack’s funeral for friends and family to share thoughts about him. I lost them. For awhile, I was afraid I’d thrown them away and told GE that I might have. “Oh, Mom! I hope not.” (“Me, too!’ I thought at the time. My thoughts were so elusive after Jack’s death that I might have thrown them away without thinking.) I found the cards in the very back of the wide shelf at the top of his closet. I tried reading one or two of them, but the emotional riptides were dragging me out to sea. I left them out; perhaps it’s time for GE and me to read them together.
Donald's holy head, my graciousness butt-crack sandwich.
I recently read an online article about a Non Mormon Feminist, Emily Matchar, and her take on Mormon Mommy Bloggers. I was actually quite impressed by her insight, understanding and acceptance. But, then I read the comments, and Gag me! I hate mean people. Seriously. So I stopped reading those nasty comments.
almost pleasurably swooping along
Me: I'm having a little girl and she'll have Down syndrome. We're really excited, but it's been hard since there have been all sorts of problems with the pregnancy.
It's trying everything, absolutely everything. It's being on prenatals, just in case. It's thinking about what you will be doing next year for Christmas, you know, when you have a baby. And then next year. And then the year after that.
Especially since we weren’t in a relationship.
To make a paper butterfly collage of your own you need a few supplies:
the impact; now think of the tide-swell,
The eBay seller confessed to all manner of problems, for the most part over-egging it though some of the scratches are feelable and sound, though not for any great length of time. Only one rival bargain hunter was not put off, but it was mine, for less than a tenner. For the cover. And what do you know. She sounds great. Those defects I can live with. I’d rather the fresh quality sound with the odd scratch than a dull plastic-sounding reissue with no scratches. Despite the good reputation of the people behind the 1980′s Mole Jazz releases – Nimbus as I recall, the 1960s Fontana is vastly superior. Now why aren’t I surprised?
This is not what I planned to write for my first blog, but something happened this afternoon that blew me away. I am the vice-principal of what I believe to be the best elementary school in Surrey. The teachers and staff who work at this school truly believe in putting in the extra time and effort to connect with and get to know their students. They understand that this time comes back to them ten-fold when students try their best. We are an inner-city school and the people who choose to work here really work hard and trust that they can make a difference in children’s lives. It is not always easy. They may not see immediate results, but they know they are making a difference by planting the seeds that will grow when the time is right. You cannot rush this process.
But writing was always different for you, ever since you first dreamed about the plush chair in an open office tens of floors up, with a view of a skyline. You know, in seventh grade when you dreamed about being an editor of a magazine, you never defined that skyline. You never picked a city. I know you say now that Chicago is the greatest city in the world, but did you make it to New York? Are you in L.A. now? Are you still in the country? Or are you still in your cornfields town? These are the things I wish I knew.
If I could take only one to a desert island it would have to be Pride & Prejudice, because I think both its hero and the heroine are particularly appealing.
Ideally, I don't want him to be so dominant and serious and dark during the day time. I want someone I can play with and laugh with and be silly with. But if he can't turn around and be in control during a spanking, can't discipline me, can't be "abusive" in bed, I can't be attracted. Not all the way.
Hokay, time for an intervention. Time for all of my more reasonably proportioned body parts to gather round and gawp in disgusted awe at my utter rotundity.
I've been looking forward to Anish Kapoor's "Leviathan" sculpture at the Grand Palais because I have a weakness for oversized installation art. Lucien was forced to come along -- he is my ambivalent and occasionally grumpy art-seeking companion. You can tell from the picture above he thought it was really something special.
Writing yourself into a corner
The Dragons were running wild over the island - pretty amazing when I think back.
This challenge is all about birthdays. Easy as can be just make something for a birthday. This challenge ends March 31 at midnight. The top 3 will be asked to be our GDT for the next challenge and the random winner will win 3 digital stamps of their choice from Gingerloft Let's see what our DT has for us this challenge!!
2- Share seven things about you, that too honestly......
The tempo runs are good reminders that, for short distances, I can run faster than the 10-minute mile I usually think myself capable of. I have never raced a distance shorter than a half-marathon, but the tempo runs make me think that a fast 5K might be kind of fun.
4 tablespoons soy sauce
If you are living around my neighbourhood or just visiting, you would have come across this poster pasted all over the place since yesterday - At the traffic lights, along the shop frontages, at restaurants and retail shops, in the banks, at the police stations, offices, at the mosques, churches and temples. Everywhere.
It felt wonderful to dress up in nice clothes and killer heels in anticipation of a wonderful dinner prepared by one of the hottest chefs in town. I checked my coat and walked over to the bar, where I scanned all of the people in the room, looking for the man who would be my date for the evening. Who was sitting alone, looking at their phone waiting for me to respond to their last text? From my viewpoint, I had two available options...a nice looking gentleman in a business suit with a flashy tie and nicely polished shoes or a very plain, tall, dorky fella in need of haircut and an overall makeover. I can only hope that I did a sufficient job of hiding the look on my face when the giant dork caught my eye and waved. And so began my evening with the Accountant.
Attire: Business casual
Or in plain English, and if you know anything at all about scatter plots and linear correlation, those scores wander all over the place and should never be used to provide any serious evidence about anything. Speculation, perhaps, but not policy or hiring or firing decisions of any sort.
The library is green too!
3) Sensory processing issues
LANDesk Acquires Data Analytics Company – LANDesk Software, a global leader in systems lifecycle management, endpoint security and IT service management, today announced the acquisition of Managed Planet. The company has unique technologies in the areas of IT asset management, business to business connectors, hardware discovery, reporting and asset analytics.
Gotta love this weather. My dispatcher told me the rain was hit or miss at KONT and maybe you'll get there between storms. Yeah, right... I knew instinctively we would arrive in the middle of heavy rain; same mechanism as low fuel equals thunderstorm over airport.
And kept on dreaming .
Using a small foam brush, I applied a layer of Mod Podge to the top surface of the tile and positioned a paper square in the center. (Be sure to smooth any air bubbles under the paper). I let them dry about 10-15 minutes and applied another layer of Mod Podge over the paper, overlapping onto the sides of the tile. (The ridges or brush strokes you see when you first apply the Mod Podge will fade as it dries, but try to make it as even as possible).
But real TPN people, well, they never eat again. Nothing. Ever. No lazy brunches, no coffee with friends, no early cocktails or ice-crystal gin clinking in the sunshine. No champagne at weddings, no decadent chocolate treats, no consoling chicken man-flu soup, no anniversary dinners.....
Fair as the sea in twilight
“Here is a new game
So something a bit more revealing. These are the shorts Jim bought me along with my jogging ones. He wanted shorter shorts then I wear and the halter top, he bought that at least 5 years ago thinking it would fit me, not then, not 4,3,2,1 years ago but today I tried it on and it fits. Still tummy to tone and some back fat and bat wings but getting there.
In fact, someone on Facebook was un-gallant enough to ask "Should Pip be so much prettier than Estella?", which was actually a fair question in the circumstances, since an unaccountably plain young woman had been chosen for that role.
Deeper than the skin.
What I've learned from playing this with several classes now is that my fifth grade students are more engaged with my ACTUAL lesson, which is to point out some ways that they can begin to distinguish whether a Wikipedia article has merit. Some of these points include looking at the amount of references and notes at the end of the article, noticing whether the page has had a rating, and looking for other signs that the article needs to be "cleaned up."
1 unperturbed
Isn’t it ironic that Alfred Nobel, a man who spent his life designing and working with explosive devices should be responsible for creating the Nobel Peace Prize?
Yep, these are the ONLY family shots I got while the kids
Before I leave home on a trip, I like to talk to the kids about where I'll be, what I'll be up to, and how I expect things to play out. I figure if they can't be there with me, they can at least have a sense of what I'm going to be experiencing.
On Memorial Day we finished the nursery. Since it's a temporary nursery until we buy our house we didn't paint but decorated and organized. I love walking in and seeing all her stuff in there. I walk in the the closet and look at all her little things hanging and I can't wait to see her in them. I feel so blessed.
Jewels of black. Wells of endless depth.
Boil the milk and keep on stirring....
Paul understood this blessing of giving and receiving, that when someone blesses you in your life, it is good and right and appropriate to share your blessings with them at some point in return, freely and voluntarily.
So as much as I'd like a new pair of jeans or a simple summer dress (vanessa Bruno athe at anaise 'printemps' 20% off) I think I'll sit this season out.
Pillows and curtains to come in the room will be this Tilbury Lapis from Calico Corners...Rawr.
1 x (1521)Guinness Foreign Extra (can) = 7.20
In winters mother would air the things stored in her old chests. I loved to sit next to her and explore the many things which were like treasures to me — Saris, little trinket boxes.
“BRING A CLEAN UH GI NEXT TIME. OOOHHHSS?”
Shocking! I think he went too far with this one…
And I have one more that I remember well. This one on a cupboard door--
I forgot to take pics of the Sewing Room.. It was so fun seeing many sewing threads, Portable Sewing machine, Knitters on their cupboard. Also I asked one rhetorical question to the waitress ” Can I buy sewing threads here?”. Ofcourse the answer is no since it’s only decoration. but her expression was hillarious.
you sit
JC: I’m weird, in that I never thought of Caroline as a villain. I know many readers consider her the archetypical “Regency mean girl,” but IMHO, that’s a bad rap. Yeah, she wanted Darcy, but not in the way Elizabeth eventually would. She wanted the status being Mrs. Darcy would bring to her. She was trying to elevate herself from trade to society. She’s nowhere near as bad as Lucy Steele, Isabella Thorpe, or Mary Crawford.
My posts this week
Obama is so comfortable telling lies that he no longer knows the difference between the truth, a falsehood, a promise, or a casual slander. Take, for example, his recent claim that he would rather be a great one-term President than “a mediocre two-term” one. If George W. Bush wasn’t around to blame for his own incompetence, Obama would have to invent him.
As we lay in the Garden of Golgotha.
Finally, after waiting another hour…. the bride and groom arrive to practice their show. Although, the celebration was supposed to start at 5:30pm… everyone was on BP Time (Black People Time) and it did not start until 7 pm. I was surprised to see several foreigners there and out of the 12 foreigners…5 were Black American… (we must have had all the Black Americans in the Province all in one spot….hehehe..I am surprise they didn’t riot)…The show began .. with the host doing some silly jokes in Chinese, the groom and bride saying some funny things about each other. Then they bowed to the audience… bowed to the parents… and bowed to each other. The parents sat down… and the bride and groom….exchanged rings, cut the cake, lite a candle together, and open champagne and made a toast. They walked back down the catwalk… and the bride gave the bouquet to her …Matron of honor. (no tossing of the bouquet here).
Can't blame Newt G too much. He was carpet bombed with negatives by Romney. Brilliant, visionary but just too much baggage! And erratic.
in case you haven't noticed lately ...
There’s always self-publishing now. It isn’t even looked down upon anymore, at least not from many people’s points of view. For example, you may have heard of the latest self-publishing sensation entitled On The Island by Tracey Garvis-Graves, which has recently hit the New York Times, USA Today, and Kindle Bestseller’s lists. (On an unrelated note, she’s also going to guest post on this blog in the future!). Literally, with the push of a button–a button, people, that says “click to publish”–many authors who self-publish their books are becoming huge successes. And then those who do become such huge successes, when they go with a Big Six house, often end up doing worse than by themselves with self-publishing. In the linked blog post (above), it correctly asserted that Amanda Hocking’s marketing with St. Martin’s was poor at best, and the covers were barely better than the self-published versions. It’s true; Big Six publishing doesn’t seem to have worked out very well for Hocking. She’s still selling, but her sales rank (going from the Amazon top 10 to the top 2,000) has certainly plummeted.
Donations can be money or specific items. There are lots of options! You can “back to school” shop for a specific starter kit or just some items… you can pick which district your donation will go to and even decide whether you want to help at the elementary, middle or high school level. Penquis is working really hard to make it easy for us to help. Look for drop boxes around the area where you can leave items. You can find details regarding the program at the Penquis web site or call the office at 564-8196 564-7116 (see comments). Parents may use the same resources to register their children for the program.
With my big lunchbox and with help from my friends
society has really grown up in thinking,
Debbie xx
arrests happen, it will remove in one large action, a great deal of
In a large stockpot (or same) over medium high heat, add oil, Spanish onion, bell pepper, garlic and jalapenos. Cook stirring until onions are clear and add the oregano and thyme. Add the chicken stock, half of the milk and all of the cream. Bring to a low simmer. Add the cooked beans and all of the seasonings. When second boil begins, turn heat down to low and simmer covered for about an hour.
Dunlop now produces a range of tyres to suit all vehicles and budgets, some of the most popular ranges include:
Chicken stew is comfort food to me. This Paprika Chicken Recipe is a favorite of mine. Without copying directly from a recipe I found years ago, I am going to take you through the steps to prepare this yummy, satisfying one-pan meal. The basic ingredients and prep steps are here, but let your tastebuds and imagination create your special chicken stew. Make a lot because you will crave more the next day, I am sure. Of note, the original recipe found in a newspaper used chicken thighs on the bone, white potatoes, carrots and pearl onions.
Read about F.I.B's visit to the Creepshow when the theme was Phantom of the Dead Presidential Wax Museum here.
Fishermen fixing a boat. The fishermen sometimes stay out on their boats for days at a time, fixing their meals and sleeping at sea.
Vegetable Stock: Homemade Freebie
Here’s a great example of what not to do (courtesy of an anonymous employer via MyCrappyResume):
Back to Korelitz. In her article she consulted psychiatrist, Julia Temple who took it to the psyche level by explaining that some women purposely avoid looking their best, or at least better, because they may not believe they are worth the time, the money, the effort, or the admiration of those who may compliment them on their appearance. The article goes on to explain that a lot of women don’t want to look like they took the time to think about an outfit and they want it to be effortless. But does effortless equal less effort?
More later
Hopefully, I will be able to breathe again soon....
It wasn't real, but I can't seem to shake it.
by playing legal tiddlywinks
what will she do next?
But sleepyhead Al was immune to the flurry.
1/2 cup rolled oats
With that said, welcome! My name is Ashley and I have recently started my own company. The company name is tootyfruitymonkeyluv and is named after my two daughters (nicknames Tooty Fruity and Monkey). I also have a fabulous step-son who is almost 13 (OMG - a teenager) and have another little fashionista on the way. The new addition is expected July 2nd (which is also Monkey's birthday and two weeks after Tooty Fruity's monkey - guess we know my fertile time of the year lol)!
Breaking up this core
At the first store, I found everything I was looking for, and in fairly ample supply. Except for the canned carrots. There wasn’t a single can of Great Value canned carrots on the shelf. So I flagged down an employee, apologized for the trouble since everyone was trying to keep the shelves full in the leadup to Thanksgiving (this was about 10 p.m. on Tuesday, and Thanksgiving of course was Thursday) and asked the employee if they could check to see if there were any cases of Great Value carrots, and if not, could they tell me how many might be in stock elsewhere? The employee came back, said that according to their computerized inventory they were totally out of Great Value carrots at that store, but that there were 96 cans–a mere eight cases–at the nearest warehouse. I thanked the employee for all of his help, picked up another case of spinach in lieu of the canned carrots and headed for the checkout.
A similar dinner occurred at my maternal grandparents’ caterpillar green clapboard two storey, sitting just across the garden from the turquoise model. This grandmother – Mom Skanes – took her cold plate – with turkey instead of ham – into the den where the radio and the Bible sat. I don’t remember hearing the radio, but am sure she opened the Bible for comfort.
Author: D.V. Berkom
Though it is not always the case, I believe,
At just after midnight, this comments piece by Rebecca Tyrrel was published on the Independent website. It follows several other seemingly anti-Catholic, and what some would call hysterical, articles by the same newspaper - Tim Stanley, writing for the Telegraph only a few days ago, exposed the "slanderous" inaccuracies in one such column. In her article, though, Tyrrel appears to draw an exaggerated link between the Papacy and the Murdoch family, possibly in an attempt to discredit both parties.
This is why it is so important to show people of color writing in this genre.
Myth #5: I don’t want the stigma of being a self-published author. I see this statement frequently on blogs and on the internet. Although I don’t begrudge any author that chooses to publish the traditional way, there are things that make self-publishing much more attractive for me. I don’t have an agent or a publicist representing me, absolutely every reader that contacts me, gets a response, from me. I feel connected to the friends I’ve made that enjoy my books and they are an exceptional source of motivation on the days when I’d rather park myself in front of the television. I have full control over my books, I can change covers, I can change text, I can even give a whole bunch of them away and no one can stop me
Los Angeles Kings (31-24-12, 74pts) @ Chicago Blackhawks (36-25-7, 79pts), 7 pm/NBC Sports Network
This is where I am currently at in my preparedness list:
Last month we revealed that crime intelligence boss Lieutenant General Richard Mdluli was deeply implicated in the looting of crime intelligence through the alleged misuse of state vehicles, safe houses and a police travel agency.
Happy Monday.
God has called you by name and made you his own.
Only 27 books are Apostolic writings. There were only 27 books plus one used by Christians from the 1st century. The additional writing is the epistle of Clement of Rome. Clement is an elder that wrote to the Church at Corinth. This book does not claim God’s guidance or to be Scripture. Also, Clement’s epistle was never added to the Scriptures under the supervision of the Apostles. The fact that there are only 27 books in the Scriptures written under the oversight of the Apostles excludes all other writings and seals the canon in the 1st century. This goes to include all the Apostolic writings. The Apostles’ supervision would include the book of James, since James was the brother of Christ, who is as much an “apostle” as Peter according to Galatians 1:18-19, and this includes the writing of Christ’s brother, Jude (Matt. 13:53, Mark 6:3, Jude 1:1) plus the book of Hebrews whose author is doubted by some, which is most likely an exhorting lesson from Paul written by Luke (see Eusebius).
This morning, I set up a table and chairs out in the garden, the weather has been gorgeous for the last week or so but it is meant to change very soon with it snowing!! apparently over Easter so we are making the most of the weather while we have it haha. I laid out all of our supplies on it and we got to work :)
I'm no doctor, but if I were I'd spend my time taping prescription-strength deodorant ordinance slips to your backs.
I think that most couples end up living together apart even at the same address. It used be twins beds, or maybe separate bedrooms. Maybe the garage workshop for the guy or a den, and a sewing room for the lady. You know, like in the old movie Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House. Even in a shared studio apartment, couples will find their own corners.
Then on Wednesday I tried something a little different. Wednesday is normally our track workout day but this is our "by" week. Of course, I can't leave well enough alone so I took a look at the FIRST marathon training plan on which I based my marathon training plan to see what was on the schedule for this week. The result? 4x800 @ 8:05 minute/mile w/1:30 minute rest intervals. So I decided I'd do it on the treadmill in the gym at work so that I could get it out of the way and maybe lift weights in the evening.
For an hour, refer to everyone as “Bob.”
“I feel so shitey I’m gonna take that as you being genuine for once in your rotten, smelly life, Danny Pongo. It’s all I can hold onto. I’m starving, cos you have no job and the brew’s fuckin me about on my benefits and we’ve hardly enough money to feed ourselves never mind the wee life that’s growing inside me –“
8. I talk like a farmer.
We also have our computer stuff on that counter...modem, router and printer. It doesn't look the best there, but we didn't have a whole lot of choices. I stuck all the wires in a basket in the corner. Any other suggestions? That's kind of an eyesore, but I wasn't really sure what to do there.
Row 21-24- ch1, sc in sm sp as join, sc in each sc, join.
Sorry this is a bit late. I ran out of town on Friday and forgot to post this.
The end of this book was terrifying. I wanted to hug my dog while reading. I have a big dog. So holding a dog while reading is kind of impossible and the logistics of it never really worked out, but I totally wanted to do it.
Ten years in, I continue to be shaken and shocked by what is happening in Afghanistan, and if I ever needed to test that position, ARMADILLO is the perfect pop quiz. The running line is that soldiers tend not to talk about what they experienced on the battefield...and after seeing something like ARMADILLO we here on the homefront instantly understand why.
In Bruce Chatwin's 1977 seminal text on the area, creatively named In Patagonia, the renowned travel writer describes the Boers as such: "They lived in fear of the Lord, celebrated Dingaan's Day and took oaths on the Dutch Reformed Bible. They did not marry outsiders and their daughters had to go to the kitchen if a Latin entered the house." De Langer is quick to dispel this notion. The Boers were forced to acclimatise to their new land, they had to learn the language and the customs of the native people. Certainly, these days Chatwin's assertion holds little weight. Every Boer descendant the Mail & Guardian spoke to had married an Argentine. If their politiek, as Chatwin claims, was once separatist, it is no longer.
Any thoughts on episode titles? I recently read a blog entry somewhere (wish I could remember which blog it was so I can give it credit) where the author was critical of any titles which gave away the direction of the story. Are there anything you aim for/try to avoid when naming episodes?
Remember everything those God-damned bastards did to us.
Whether you want to pamper yourself or someone special you don't want to miss out on this great giveaway.
For some reason I also get a significant amount of email from people that are either visiting Argentina or have loved ones traveling that way. A couple of pointers here: No, Argentina is NOT as safe as the first world country you probably come from. Don’t ever forget that. As long as you stay in the well-known locations, surrounded by lots of tourists like yourself, chances are you’ll be ok. Play Indiana Jones or even more to the point, Lara Croft, and those chances decrease significantly. If you’re feeling adventurous, try backpacking across Europe first. Europe is safe in comparison. South America isn’t. Women backpacking across Argentina and Latin America in general often fail to understand how different these places can be. Maybe influenced by movies, or after reading about how wonderful this or that place is, they fail to see the danger in lawless, isolated parts of the world. What one young woman may see as spiritual and worldly adventure, in the mind of an unscrupulous local she is just another dumb white woman he can have his way with. Local women in these northern provinces get raped all the time, they even get kidnapped and turned into sex slaves, sent to brothels all across the country. A naïve young woman with a life experience limited to safe environments is in an even greater disadvantage. Even for seasoned and experienced female backpackers, its simply not safe.
Within less than fifty years from now the descendants of those British and Australian soldiers who fought in the great world wars of the twentieth Century will be an ethnic minority in the homelands they fought for. If that is not betrayal, then nothing is betrayal.
One of the most ridiculous and unfair “rules” of most retail businesses here in Saudi Arabia is their “return policies.” Some businesses have absolutely NO return policy whatsoever! You buy a product - and if it doesn’t work, or if it doesn’t fit, or if you just changed your mind – well, TOO BAD! There are some businesses that have a return/exchange policy. However, most of the companies that DO have a return policy have a measly three day time frame in which to return or exchange the product.
stop it or i won't delete this post when you're older and there will be an arsenal full of embarrassing info for your 16 year-old girlfriend.
4. We must avoid envy. God is sovereign and does not make mistakes. He always has a reason when He refuses to give us what we want. Therefore, we should not become envious of other people for what they have.
All you need is cream cheese (about 2 boxes of philly cream cheese), chopped green onion, shredded sharp cheddar, and crumbled bacon. crumble some pecans onto wax paper, and roll the ball until covered completely, and enjoy with your favorite cracker. There are no measurements. Add as much as you'd like. You can put anything you want in a cheese ball. When you put the bacon in, make sure to dab all grease off, otherwise it will make your ball runny. Bacon needs to be extra crispy too!
Hopefully, I will be able to post from Guernsey tomorrow.
The first two miles were hot hot. As in, "Oh my gosh, are you serious?" hot. After that, I think I got used to the heat--or at least my body realized that we were seriously going to run 26 miles in it (the highest recorded temperature along the course was 89 degrees). I drank water and Gatorade at every water station, and settled in to enjoy the experience.
As she gingerly handled
"I would like to forget what I cannot change;
Almost instantaneously the engines stopped.
Secure in the belief that I’d also met his wife at my show, I gladly accepted. His backyard was set up with a BBQ, lots of folding chairs and a cooler of drinks. Clearly they were settling in for a relaxing afternoon. I was more than happy to be a part of the festivities, and immediately went to introduce myself to everyone. Fortunately my host got there ahead of me, and quickly shouted out to everyone there.
“Lot of gas,” said the guard.
Genres : Adventure, Comedy
Good story, huh? And it’s true, every word of it! Here’s the pictorial evidence.
i trust you
A gift.
She gasped. “It is not a booty call. It’s a date.”
MW: There’s been no response. We’ll be back in special session the second week of August to vote on a Senate passed aid bill for the states. We intend then to raise the question again about releasing the report.
Aluminum foil to wrap the garlic in
I am not saddened, by what is expected of me
So they took the tooth out. It came out so easy — it felt like when you accidentally pop a temporary crown off.
1) Choose 5 blogs with less than 200 followers to pass the award on to.
SUB: LATE STEVE JOB'S WILL
He wheeled around, eyes darting this way and that, looking very panicked.
That's it for me, kiddos. Hope your weekend's rockin'!
A good example of a HIIT workout:
"You know," she started hesitantly and very astonished, "it's just that nobody actually likes me. It is my destiny to visit humans for a while but when I show up they are scared of me. They are afraid of me and try to avoid me like the plague." The Sadness swallowed some tears. "They invented phrases that they try to ban me with. They say things like: 'Nonsense, I can't be sad. Life is always bright and fun.' And their fake smiles give them stomach cramps and they have a hard time breathing. They say: 'I just need to get over it,' and then they end up with heartache. They say, 'One just has to put it all together and suck it up!' and then they feel all kinds of aches and pains in their shoulders and backs. They say: 'Only weak people cry!' and the banked up tears almost make their heads burst. Or they try to numb themselves with alcohol or drugs so that they don't have to feel me."
That was the last time I talked to her.
-reusable
2 green onions, chopped (I subbed in a shallot)
“And, there is no Scripture that demands that the title Rock can only be applied to God”
Back then, I was a baby. I was in primary school, I had lots of friends, and I thought that my stepsister could solve any problem ever. I really want to give her one chance to solve this one.
One thing I didn't mention in my post on Avengers - because I was saving it for here - is that I snuck in a box of cookies when I saw it. I was surrounded by people with popcorn and soda, and one can hardly blame them; it's that kind of movie. Still, I had already bitten the bullet and chose to pay full price - a whopping thirteen dollars - to see the film, and I was not about to add another ten bucks on popcorn and soda myself. Unlike the film critic in the preceding article, Michael Wolff, I stuck my cookies in my knapsack. I saw no need to flaunt them.
Featuring Master of Ceremonies Trav S.D. and the following Attractions:
The family is mourning, but we are also celebrating his life. He was a farmer and gardner, a man who was connected to the earth and had no need to complicate life. We are celebrating Pepere’s well lived 97 years. It is not tragic when someone who has had a long, healthy and happy life passes on. It’s sad, and there is a noticeable gap left in the space he occupied in our lives. But he embodied many of the things we all hope for; he left a legacy of love and goodness. He treasured family and knew what real success was. He worked hard and played lots.
I had all these plans for this week. Good plans. Fun plans. Lots of hard work plans.....
So Monday, I took the day off to hang with The Geej who--have I mentioned?--is sick. She'd been running a fever off and on since Friday evening, and I wanted to get her in to see the doctor on Monday morning. A good chunk of Monday is spent dealing with her under-the-weatheredness (diagnosis: bad bronchitis) and also, the whole wallet debacle. I even dragged my poor child to the driver's licence office so she could experience the fun that is our Government At Work.
of enchantment and the materials
What stays with you latest and deepest? of curious panics,
During this time, an equal reality is that people will die. Men, women and children injured in the earthquake will not get the treatment they need. Infants forced to drink unclean water because the pipe network has broken will die from dehydration brought about through diarrhoeal disease. Frail or chronically ill people left shocked and exposed without shelter may pass away.
Staff were still recovering from the shock of the robbery when Grlic, this time without his balaclava, walked back in to settle his overdraft.
Deirdre laid an egg in the garden too.
Pricing: 2 hour excursion at 7 am or 10 am $270; 1:30 pm is $235
An old man named Henry, living at the Cobble Hill Health Center in Brooklyn for more than 10 years, habitually sits in his wheelchair with his head hanging, appearing to be barely alive.
The kid’s empathic skill is handy, that’s for sure, Rayloth thought, nodding once to his Padawan.
The Richard Rosson-directed film was made for Paramount, and features the Paramount "junior stars." Besides Brooks, its cast includes then up-and-comers Richard Arlen, James Hall, Nancy Phillips, and El Brendel. Rolled Stockings, adapted from an original story idea by Frederica Sagor, proved popular in the summer of 1927 – and not only in the United States. It also played across Latin America and Europe.
There is nothing else that makes me feel more masculine than being covered in car grease as I am right now. With the physical limitations on me at the moment I have a hard time going out and working on my own truck, but Danny only needed his positive cable changed out. Something he could have done all on his own, but he is a good boy and lets Dad come help him. He knows I miss working on cars and he knows I love the feel of car grease.
Get a hold of this book and take notes. It’s well-worth your time to read a book that will prove invaluable.
I'd like to end today's post with a clip of Celtic Woman....my dad took us to see them two years ago and it was incredible! Happy St. Patrick's Day!!!!
Could a garden come up from this ground, at all?
Please share your stories about the most memorable baby shower you attended. Any tips on home made gifts? Are you a Dawn Meehan fan? Leave a comment and you will be entered to win an autographed copy of Dawn’s book!
According to figures just released by the St Lucia Tourist Board, stay-over arrival arrivals to the island for the first quarter of this year totaled 95,170, representing a 15% increase over the same period last year.
Similarly the Islamic armed forces are exhorted to give their Bai’a (pledge) for; to listen and obey, in hard times and in ease, and in likeness (i.e. to listen and obey while one is active) and in dislikeness (i.e. listen and obey when one is tired). Allah (swt) said:
Ormerud P. Tuberculosis in pregnancy and the puerperium. Thorax 2001; 56: 494-499.
This is the first ring. There are 3 stacks of pounded rusty gold rings that have a swivel feature so they stay together. I really thought that was neat! I wanted to get a smaller size so I could wear it on my pinky. I really like the look of this ring and how simple/modern it is. Love it!
If it were possible to point out how this government has fulfilled any of its 2010 election manifesto or it’s 120 day plan…..I’d give them a chance. But at every turn they lie and abuse the country and for that they will get nothing but scathing criticism from the Pantomime. Marsha and her minions better get ready to be very busy at this website! This isn’t a government I can have any Confidence in….and I don’t need Rowley’s PNM to tell me that!
Numbers, Chapter 30, makes specific provision for this, under the Mosaic Law.
This is a card that I made some time ago with a set I wish I would've kept. (I sold it after it retired and now want it back you know?) I hate that when that happens. I did save the wheel however and use it a lot. The colors are Ruby Red, Creamy Caramel and black. I used the Rough Jumbo Wheel and the You're a Classic stamp set. The spiral punch finished off the mat in a fun way too. It would be a great card with the pickup in the apple set in the new catalog. I can't remember the name right now and I'm not near my catalog.
(well, doing so seems a bit of an overkill to me, don't know...),
The tempura course that followed featured a small assortment of spring vegetables (I didn’t catch all the Japanese names) served with grated ginger, daikon and dashi-based dipping sauce. The light batter really allowed the vegetables to shine through, however their clean flavours were so delicate the sauce did overshadow them slightly.
For you are surrounded and completely consumed
How should we respond to these arguments?
“It (the contract) generally mirrors changes in the FOP (Fraternal Order of Police) contract that represents patrol officers,” he said.
Sunday 2:40 - 3:20 Kara Grainger (Blues Rock from Australia) Tiny Stage
The conversation then turned to Gotye’s recent pop success which the Belgian-Aussie commented that, “It wasn’t a world I expected to enter in any way,” but he was grateful for the love and support he’d received. On the subject of “pop”, he also revealed that his favorite Katy Perry song was “Teenage Dream”.
So, all you have to do is download the absolution app onto your iphone or android device and you’re basically ready to go. This is where we start to earn money. For the simple app, the user pays $ 4.99. For this you get the basic packet: A list of sins you just click on to confess (you can also enter the number of times you sinned and there’s a graded scale of severity you input), press the Send button and you’re done. The basic packet includes three free absolutions but you may have to wait a while for it and the individual penance necessary for it to become effective, because the server collects and collates the sins and sends them to the priest three or four times a day, who then formally gives the absolution. The severity of the penance can be automatically programmed into the software so that the priest doesn’t have to work this out individually – minor transgressions like little lies or shoplifting get one Hail Mary, for more major things like murder, marital infidelity, or sexual abuse of minors a couple of Rosaries would be imposed.
There are thus five specific buttons a viewer can push, each of which corresponds to one of these characters: "When one of the five character buttons is pressed a version of that character's scenario is chosen from a database of possible outcomes." It is a choose-your-own-adventure cube of light, a projection whose contents are partially decided by viewer interest.
lily: he taught us to be nice and not lie.
To get rid of the flat part I used the slice tool once more. then I duplicated the horse's head and flipped the copy. By machining the two sides I will have two halves to glue together making a complete head.
12. Music Revelation Ensemble - Baby Talk
The special effects were outstanding, really shining in all their gruesome glory in the aforementioned garbage disposal scene, and a nice little bit of nastiness involving a cheese grater! There was even a scene with animated demons that was a subtle reference to The Gate, of all things.
